
AP WORLD HISTORY 
UNIT 8 
Cold War and 
Decolonization 
c. 1900 to the present 
AP EXAM WEIGHTING 
o] ~14-17 
_Ej 
Remember to go to AP Classroom 
to assign students the online 
Personal Progress Check for 
this unit. 
Whether assigned as homework or 
completed in class, the Personal 
Progress Check provides each 
student with immediate feedback 
related to this unit's topics and skills. 
Personal Progress Check 8 
Multiple-choice: ~25 questions 
Short-answer: 2 questions 
= No source 
= Primary source 
Free-response: 1 question 
= Document-based 
8_1 o% AP EXAM WEIGHTING "1 4_17 CLASS PERIODS 
Cold War and Decolonization 
c. 1900 to the present 
UNIT AT A GLANCE 
) 
E i : Class Periods /7  
Topic Process Suggested Skill ~14-17 CLASS PERIODS 7 
i 
ARE 
8.1 Setting the Stage for Continuity and @8 Explain how a specific historical / 
§ the Cold War and Change development or process is situated / - 
Decolonization within a broader historical context. i 
7 
8.2 The Cold War Causation X1 Explain the point of view, i, 
5 purpose, historical situation, and/or / / 
audience of a source. : 
8.3 Effects of the Cold War Comparison [ Explain how a historical Y 
E development or process relates 7 
to another historical development : // 
or process. / / 
:% 
A 
8.4 Spread of Communism Causation EXd Explain the significance of a % 
After 1900 source's point of view, purpose, e ,{/ 
E g historical situation, and/or audience, / 
including how these might limit the 
use(s) of a source. 
8.5 Decolonization After Comparison 3 Explain how a historical 
1900 development or process relates 
to another historical development 
or process. 
= 8.6 Newly Independent Continuityand  [EXE Explain how claims or evidence 
3 States Change support, modify, or refute a 
source's argument. 
8.7 Global Resistance to Causation EXI Explain the point of view, 
Established Power purpose, historical situation, and/or 
Structures After 1900 audience of a source, 
continuedon  next page / 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V1 | 141 /;/?2 
"
N \ o 
A 
N  N — 
UNIT > 
8 Cold War and Decolonization 
UNIT AT A GLANCE 
] 
g 0 Clas s Periods 
g E Reasoning 
FE Topic Process Suggested Skill ~14-17 CLASS PERIODS 
8.8 End of the Cold War Causation KX Explain a historical concept, 
§ development, or process. 
8.9 Causation in the Age Causation [X Corroborate, qualify, or modify 
of the Cold War and an argument using diverse and 
Decolonization alternative evidence in order to 
develop a complex argument. 
This argument might: 
= Explain nuance of an issue by 
analyzing multiple variables. 
= Explain relevant and insightful 
connections within and 
across periods. 
= Explain the relative historical 
significance of a source's 
credibility and limitations. 
= Explain how or why a historical 
claim or argument is or is 
not effective. 
—_ -— _ 
| Go to AP Classroom to assign the Personal Progress Check for Unit 8. 
Review the results in class to identify and address any student misunderstandings. 
142 | Course Framework V.1 AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description
Cold War and Decolonization 
SAMPLE INSTRUCTIONAL ACTIVITIES 
The sample activities on this page are optional and are offered to provide possible ways to 
incorporate instructional approaches into the classroom. Teachers do not need to use these 
activities and are free to alter or edit them. The examples below were developed in partnership 
with teachers from the AP community to share ways that they approach teaching some of the 
topics in this unit. Please refer to the Instructional Approaches section beginningonp. 171 for 
more examples of activities and strategies. 
Activity Topic Sample Activity 
1 8.1 Quickwrite and Debriefing 
Display Paul Plaschke’s cartoon of the Yalta Conference (1945). Ask students to write a 
quick reply to the following prompt: Predict how this cartoon might provide context for 
understanding Unit 8. 
Ask a few students to share, and debrief by discussing how the events of World War I 
provide essential context for understanding the Cold War. 
2 8.2 Self/Peer Revision 
Provide excerpts from John Foster Dulles’s “Dynamic Peace” speech (1957), V. M. Molotov's 
"The Task of Our Time: Unite Against the Enslavement of the People” (1947}, and 
President Sukarno's speech at the opening of the Bandung Conference (1955). Have students 
use the documents to respond to the learning objective for this topic with a claim/thesis 
statement and then practice writing explanations on how or why the document’s point of view, 
purpose, situation, or audience is relevantto  that argument. As students work, ask them to 
seek feedback and suggestions from classmates. 
3 8.8 Create Representation 
Have students read and annotate "The Events of 1989-1992" section of "1789-1792 
and 1989-1992: Global Interaction of Social Movements" by Patrick Manning (available 
on World History Connected) before class. In small groups, have students discuss the 
author's argument and then create a political cartoon that summarizes and explains the 
social movements discussed. 
4 8.9 Guided Discussion 
Provide students with the following claim: The Cold War increased the influence of 
the United States in the world but ultimately weakened the influence of Russia. Lead a 
discussion about how to develop a complex argument that supports a claim like this as well 
as acknowledges and discusses evidence that contradicts it. 
[£ Unit Planning Notes 
Use the space below to plan your approach to the unit. Consider how you want to pace your course and 
methods of instruction and assessment. 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework W.1 | 143 
\H.\ 
N =, o 
NRN R N N N N N 
UNIT — — 
8 Cold War and Decolonization 
SUGGESTED SKILL Toplc 8.1
28 Contextualization  
e | O0LHING the Stage 
et | for the Cold War and 
Decolonization 
Required Course Content 
THEMATIC FOCUS 
Governance [ 
A variety of internal and external factors contribute to state formation, expansion, 
and decline. Governments maintain order through a variety of administrative 
institutions, policies, and procedures, and governments obtain, retain, and exercise 
power in different ways and for different purposes. 
LEARNING OB.JECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
|U8n: Lieartnin g ObjectiveA  KC-6.2.11 
| Explain the historical context Hopes for greater self-government were largely 
of the Cold War after 1945. unfulfilled following World War |; however, in 
the years following World War Il, increasing 
anti-imperialist sentiment contributed to the 
dissolution of empires and the restructuring 
of states. 
KC-6.2.IV.C.i| 
Technological and economic gains experienced 
during World War |l by the victorious nations 
shifted the global balance of power. 
144 | Course Framework V.1 AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description
UNIT 
Eold War and Decolo:_lizatiog_ 
TOPIC 8.2 SUGGESTED SKILL 
2@ Sourcing and 
Situation 
The Cold War 
Explain the point of view, 
purpose, historical situation, 
and/or audience of a source. 
B 
Required Course Content ILLUSTRATIVE EXAMPLES 
MNon-Aligned Movement: 
* Sukarno in Indonesia 
* Kwame Nkrumah 
THEMATIC FOCUS in Ghana 
Cultural Developments and Interactions [ 
The development of ideas, beliefs, and religions illustrates how groups in society 
view themselves, and the interactions of societies and their beliefs often have 
paolitical, social, and cultural implications. 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
[Unit 8; Learning Objective B| [Ke-6.2.v.ciil 
Explain the causes and The global balance of economic and political 
effects of the ideological power shifted during and after World War Il 
struggle of the Cold War. and rapidly evolved into the Cold War. The 
democracy of the United States and the 
authoritarian communist Soviet Union emerged 
as superpowers, which led to ideological 
conflict and a power struggle between 
capitalism and communism across the globe. 
Ke-6.2v.8| 
Groups and individuals, including the 
Non-Aligned Movement, opposed and 
promoted alternatives to the existing 
economic, political, and social orders. 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V.1 | 145 
\ 
NN 
— N o 
UNIT 
o 8 _ Cold War and Decoloniza_tion 
SUGGESTED SKILL Topl Cc8.3 
®3 Making Connections 
?filflln how a historical E fie ct s Of 
development or process 
relates to another historical th l w 
development or process. e o ar 
E 
ILLUSTRATIVEEXAMPLES |  Required Course Content 
Proxy wars: 
* Korean War 
= Angolan Civil War | 
« Sandinista-Contras _ THEMATIC FOCUS 
conflict in Nicaragua Governancem 
A variety of internal and external factors contribute to state formation, expansion, 
and decline. Governments maintain order through a variety of administrative 
institutions, policies, and procedures, and governments obtain, retain, and exercise 
power in different ways and for different purposes. 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
Unit8 : Learning Objective C| |KC-6.2.1V.D| 
Compare the ways in which The Cold War produced new military alliances, 
the United States and the including NATO and the Warsaw Pact, and 
Soviet Union sought to led to nuclear proliferation and proxy wars 
maintain influence over the between and within postcolonial states in 
course of the Cold War. Latin America, Africa, and Asia. 
146 | Course Framework V.1 AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description
( UNIT 
Cold War a_rld Dagolonization 
TOPIC 8.4 SUGGESTED SKILL 
2@ Sourcing and 
Situation 
Spread of Communism 
Explain the significance of 
After 1900 a source's point of view, 
purpose, historical situation, 
and/or audience, including 
how these might limit the 
use(s) of a source. 
B 
Required Course Content 
ILLUSTRATIVE EXAMPLES 
Land and resource 
redistribution: 
* Communist Revolution 
THEMATIC FOCUS for Vietnamese 
Economics Systems 1 independence 
As societies develop, they affect and are affected by the ways that they produce, * Mengistu Haile Mariam 
exchange, and consume goods and services. in Ethiopia 
= Land reform in Kerala 
and other states 
within India 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
* White Revolution in Iran 
Uniit 8: Learning Objective D/ KC-6.2.11] 
Explain the causes and As a result of internal tension and Japanese 
consequences of China's aggression, Chinese communists seized power. 
adoption of communism. These changes in China eventually led to 
communist revolution. 
[ke-6.a.LA.i] 
In communist China, the government controlled 
the national economy through the Great Leap 
Forward, often implementing repressive policies, 
with negative repercussions for the population. 
THEMATIC FOCUS 
Social Interactions and Organization Ef 
The process by which societies group their members and the norms that govern 
the interactions between these groups and between individuals influence political, 
economic, and cultural institutions and organization. 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
[Unit8 : Learning ObjectiveE | [ke-6.2110.i] 
Explain the causes and effects Movements to redistribute land and resources 
of movements to redistribute developed within states in Africa, Asia, 
economic resources. and Latin America, sometimes advocating 
communism or socialism. 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V.1 | 147 
MNN NN 
UNIT T H 
8 _Cold War and Eecolgmzation | 
SUGGESTED SKILL 
% Making Connections | TOP'C 8-5 
P | D@COlONization 
relates to another historical 
development or process.  After 1900 
E 
SADFENETIN RN Required Course Content 
Nationalist leaders and 
parties: 
= Indian Mational Congress 
* Ha Chi Minh in French THEMATIC FOCUS 
Indoehina (Vietnarn) 
» Kwame Nkrumah in Governance 
British Gold Coast A variety of internal and external factors contribute to state formation, expansion, 
(Ghana) and decline. Governments maintain order through a variety of administrative 
+ Gamal Abdel Nasser institutions, policies, and procedures, and governments obtain, retain, and exercise 
in Egypt power in different ways and for different purposes. 
Negotiated independence: 
* |India from the 
British Empire LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
* The Gold Coast from Unit 8: Learning Objective F| |KC-6.2.1LA| 
the British Empire Compare the processes Nationalist leaders and parties in Asia and 
* French West Africa by which various peoples Africa sought varying degrees of autonomy 
Independence through pursued independence within or independence from imperial rule. 
armed struggle: after 1900. ik!:-s.u 1‘?:| 
: ‘::g:g: :fngl:ge After the end of World War ||, some colonies 
negotiated their independence, while others 
* Angola fromthe. achieved independence through armed struggle. 
Portuguese empire A el 
* Vietnam from the l"-‘-.-?-.?.—“—_fll By . 
French empire Regional, religious, and ethnic movements 
challenged colonial rule and inherited imperial 
Regional, religious, and 
ethnic movements: boundaries. Some of these movements 
advocated for autonomy. 
= Muslim League in 
British India 
* Québécois separatist 
movement in Canada 
* Biafra secessionist 
maovement in Nigeria 
148 | Course Framework \.1 AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description
_C.'o‘ld War and Decolonization 
TOPIC 8.6 SUGGESTED SKILL 
% Claims and 
Evidence in Sources 
Newly Independent 
Explain how claims or 
States evidence support, modify, 
or refute a source's 
argurment. 
B 
Required Course Content ILLUSTRATIVE EXAMPLES 
States created by redrawing 
of political boundaries: 
= Israel 
THEMATIC FOCUS = Cambodia 
Governance * Pakistan 
Avariety of internal and external factors contribute to state formation, expansion, 
and decline. Governments maintain order through a variety of administrative 
institutions, policies, and procedures, and governments obtain, retain, and exercise 
power in different ways and for different purposes. 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
|Unit B: Learning Objective G| KC-6.2.ILA.i| 
Explain how paolitical The redrawing of political boundaries after the 
changes in the period from withdrawal of former colonial authorities led to 
c. 1900 to the present led to the creation of new states. 
territorial, demographic, and |KC-6.2.111.Auii| 
nationalist developments, 
The redrawing of paolitical boundaries in some 
cases led to conflict as well as population 
displacement and/or resettlements, including 
those related to the Partition of India and the 
creation of the state of Israel. 
continued on next page 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V.1 | 149 
o 
N 2 N 
. N Ny N NN NN 
UNIT 
8 Cold War and Decolonization 
ILLUSTRATIVE EXAMPLES 
(CONT'D) 
Governments guiding THEMATIC FOCUS 
economic life: Economics Systems [ 
= Gamal Abde| Nasser's As societies develop, they affect and are affected by the ways that they produce, 
promotion of economic exchange, and consume goods and services. 
development in Egypt 
= Indira Ghandi's 
economic policies 
e LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
= Julius Nyerere's |Unit 8: Learning Objective H| |Kke-8.3.€| 
modernization Explain the economic In newly independent states after World War I, 
in Tanzania changes and continuities governments often took on a strong role in 
* Sirimavo Bandaranaike's resulting from the guiding economic life to promote development. 
economic policies in 
SriLanka process of decolonization. [[KKeC-—68..22..11m .8] 
The migration of former colonial subjects to 
Migrations: 
imperial metropoles (the former colanizing 
* South Asians to Britain country), usually in the major cities, maintained 
= Algerians to France cultural and economic ties between the colony 
* Filipinos to the and the metropole even after the dissolution 
United States of empires. 
150 | Course Framework V.1 AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description
—— UNIT — 
_Cold War and Decolonization ] 8 
TOPIC 8.7 oo 
Global Resistance to - 
Established Power s o 
Structures After 1900 | 
E 
Required Course Content ILLUSTRATIVE EXAMPLES 
Responses that intensified 
conflict: 
= Chile under 
Augusto Pinochet 
THEMATIC FOCUS o Spikiiider 
Cultural Developments and Interactions Francisco Franco 
The development of ideas, beliefs, and religions illustrates how groups in society + Uganda under Idi Amin 
view themselves, and the interactions of societies and their beliefs often have + The buildup of the 
political, social, and cultural implications. military-industrial 
complex and 
weapons trading 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS '\‘_‘ml ents that used 
z : . violence: 
|umu_f Lelrn.hq om_-nmr-l: |KC-6.2V . . + Shining Path 
Explain various reactions to Although conflict dominated much of the + Al-Qasd 
existing power structures in 20th century, many individuals and groups— B e 
the period after 1900. including states—opposed this trend. Some 
individuals and groups, however, intensified 
the conflicts. 
|KC-6.2V.A| 
Groups and individuals challenged the many 
wars of the century, and some, such as 
Mohandas Gandhi, Martin Luther King Jr., 
and Nelson Mandela, promoted the practice 
of nonviolence as a way to bring about 
political change. 
|Ke-6.2M.C 
Militaries and militarized states often 
responded to the proliferation of conflicts in 
ways that further intensified conflict. 
|KC-6.2V.D| 
Some movements used violence against 
civilians in an effort to achieve political aims. 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V.1 | 151 
— ) 
3 8 _ _ _golfl War fld_DEcoloniza_tion 
SUGGESTED SKILL TOPIC 8.8 
% Developments and 
o End of 
Explain a historical concept, 
development, or process. the COId Wa.r 
Required Course Content 
THEMATIC FOCUS 
Governance 
A variety of internal and external factors contribute to state formation, expansion, 
and decline. Governments maintain order through a variety of administrative 
institutions, policies, and procedures, and governments obtain, retain, and exercise 
power in different ways and for different purposes. 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENTS 
|Unit8 : Learning ObjectiveJ | |KC-6.2IV.E] 
Explain the causes of the end Advances in U.S. military and technological 
of the Cold War. development, the Soviet Union's costly and 
ultimately failed invasion of Afghanistan, and 
public discontent and economic weakness 
in communist countries led to the end of the 
Cold War and the collapse of the Soviet Union. 
152 | Course Framework V.1 AP World History: Medern Course and Exam Description
. < unir 
Eo_lld War and Decolonization B 8 
TOPIC 8.9 % Argunanition 
C au s atlon ln the gmborate. qualify, or 
maodify an argument using 
Age of the Cold War e 
and Decolonization g i 
multiple variables. 
= Explain relevant 
The final topic in this unit focuses on the skill of argumentation and so provides an and insightful 
opportunity for your students to draw upon the key concepts and historical developments connections within and 
they have studied in this unit. Using evidence relevant to this unit's key concepts, students across periods. 
should practice the suggested skill for this topic. = Explain the relative 
historical significance 
Required Course Content of a source’s credibility 
and limitations. 
= Explain how or why 
LEARNING OBJECTIVE REVIEW: UNIT 8 KEY CONCEPTS | :r“;f;i’::;f';":r 
[Unit8: Learning Objective K. [c-6.2| is not effective. 
Explain the extent to which Peoples and states around the world 
the effects of the Cold War challenged the existing political and 
were similar in the Eastern social order in varying ways, leading to 
and Western Hemispheres, unprecedented worldwide conflicts. 
|Ke-6.2.1| 
Hopes for greater self-government 
were largely unfulfilled following the 
World War |, however, in the years 
following the World War Il, increasing anti- 
imperialist sentiment contributed to the 
dissolution of empires and the restructuring 
of states. 
KC-6.2.0V.C| 
The Cold War conflict extended beyond its 
basic ideological origins to have profound 
effects on economic, political, social, and 
cultural aspects of global events. 
[Ke-6.3] 
The role of the state in the domestic economy 
varied, and new institutions of global 
association emerged and continued to develop 
throughout the century. 
|KC-6.3.1 
States responded in a variety of ways to the 
economic challenges of the 20th century. 
AP World History: Modern Course and Exam Description Course Framework V.1 | 153 

M AP WORLD HISTORY: MODERN Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
Document 1 
Sowrce: Manmohini Zutshi Saghal, participant in the Indian struggle for independence, An Indian Freedom Fighter 
Recalls Her Life, 1994 
In March 1922 Gandhi was arrested and sentenced to six years of imprisonment. He was released on January 12, 1924, 
before the expiration of his term. This earlier noncooperation movement was confined largely to men and was less 
extensive than the sarvagraha [literally “truth-force,” referring to the nonviolent resistance approach developed by 
Gandhi] movement of 1930-32. Women were expected to participate in processions and attend all Congress meetings, 
however, so with mother and my two older sisters, Chandra and Janak, I used to join all such functions. I would like my 
readers to visualize the restricted life women led, even in a province as progressive as the Punjab. Women hardly ever 
ventured beyond four walls of their homes, except to visit relatives or to attend a religious festival. My mother’s aunt 
always wore a shawl over her sari when she went visiting. | suppose that could be considered as a sort of Hindu burga 
[cloak worn by secluded women] although her face was left uncovered. In that atmosphere, for the women to leave their 
homes and walk in a procession was a big step forward. 
The present footwear, chappals [sandals], had just come into fashion, and women unused to walking any distance in a 
disciplined manner found if extremely difficult to walk in their chappals. The chappals would come off as the women 
walked in procession. They could not pause to put them on again and usually continued walking barefoot in the 
procession. Mother had two Congress volunteers walk behind the women. Their job was to pick up any odd chappal left 
behind, put it in a cloth bag, and bring it to the office of the District Congress Committee at Pari Mahal, where the 
procession usually terminated. The women would reclaim their footwear then go home. This was the training period. 
Later, these women would come into their own and storm the citadels of the mighty British Empire. 
Document 2 
Source: Song Qingling, widow of Chinese nationalist leader Sun Yixian (Sun Yat-sen), magazine article, 1942. 
Women have not only worked but fought. I know personally of an instance in which the female population of a village in 
the Hainan Island fought off a small Japanese landing made when their menfolk were away. They had only farm 
implements to fight with, and many were killed, but the enemy force was compelled to reembark. Similar happenings 
must have occurred in a great many places throughout the country, unheralded and unknown. As for individual cases, 
there is a story in almost every district of some girl who, emulating Mu Lan [the fifth-century Chinese Heroine who 
masqueraded as a male in order to take her ill father’s place as a soldier on the frontier of old], changed into men’s 
clothing and fought the army. 
The fighting record of our women does not permit us to believe that they will ever again allow themselves to be enslaved 
whether by a national enemy or by social reaction at home. Only an extension of democracy, including the rights of 
women, can bring real victory in this war. Such a victory, won by the united efforts of the people, will leave no room for 
any scheme of things other than democracy. 
When the victory over aggression is achieved, Chinese women will stand with the women of all countries, as those who 
have suffered much more than even the men in the mad revel of fascism and war that has spread throughout the world, 
ready and willing to see that in the future all movement shall be forward, that the earth’s present frightful testing-time 
AP World History: Modern Page 1 of 64
unit 8 questions 
shall be the last of its kind. 
Document 3 
Source: Huda Shaarawi, Egyptian national activist, leader of the Egyptian women’s movement, speech at the Arab 
Feminist Conference, Cairo, 1944 
The woman, given by the Creator, the right to vote for the successor to the prophet, is deprived of the right to vote for a 
deputy in a circuit or district election by a [male] being created by God. At the same time, this right is enjoyed by a man 
who might have less education and experience than the woman. And she is the mother who has given birth to the man and 
has raised him and guided him. The Sharia [Islamic law] gave her the right to education, to take part in the hijra [referring 
to the time of the Prophet Muhammad and his flight from Mecca to Medina], and to fight in the ranks of the warriors and 
has made her equal to the man in all rights and responsibilities, even in the crimes that either sex can commit. However, 
the man who alone distributes rights, has kept for himself the right to legislate and rule, generously turning over to his 
partner his own share of responsibilities and sanction without secking her opinion about the decision. The woman today 
demands to regain her share of rights that have been taken away from her and gives back to the ma the responsibilities and 
sanction he has given her. 
Document 4 
Source: Teodora Ignacia Gomes, a leading party member in the African Party for the Independence of Guinea and Cape 
verde, interviewed by the writer and journalist Stephanie Urdang, 1974. 
If we construct a society without exploitation of man by man, then of course women will be free in that society. Our 
struggle for national liberation is one way of assuring the liberation of women because by doing the same work as men, or 
by doing work that ensures the liberation of our country, a woman will convince herself that she is able to do the same 
work as men. In the process, women will learn that they are able to do many things they could not have conceived of 
before. They will learn that in our party there are women in the highest level of leadership and that women are working in 
all different sectors of our lives. This is important because it convinces women that they have potential and shows men 
what that potential is. 
Document 5 
Source: Marie-Aimée Helie-Lucas, participant in the Algerian War of Independence (1954-1962) waged against French 
colonial rule, paper presented to the International Symposium on Women and the Military System, Siunto Baths, Finland, 
1987. 
So much for Fanon’s [Frantz Fanon, author of The Wretched of the Earth and other writings on the experience of the 
colonized] and others’ myth of the Algerian woman liberated along with her country. The liberated women were in the 
kitchen, they were sewing clothes (or flags?), carrying parcels, typing. Nevertheless, since there was “no humble task in 
the revolution™ we did not dispute the roles we had. It would have been mean to question the priority of liberating the 
country, since independence would surely bring an end to discrimination against women. What makes me angrier in 
retrospect is not women’s confinement but the brainwashing that did not allow us young women even to think of 
questioning. What makes me angrier still is to witness the replication of this situation in other struggles for independence. 
It angers me to see women covering the misbehavior of their fellow men and hiding, in the name of national solidarity and 
identity, crimes which will be perpetuated after independence. 
Page 2 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit § questions 
This is the real harm which comes with liberation struggles. The overall task of women during liberation is seen as 
symbolic. Faced with colonization the people have to build a national identity based on their own values, traditions, 
religion, language and culture. Women bear the heavy burden of safeguarding this threatened identity. And this burden 
exacts Its price. 
1. 
Historical Background: The rise of nationalist movements and the modern nation-state has affected women’s 
political and economic participation and social freedoms. 
Based on the documents, analyze the opportunities and barriers that nationalist movements posed concerning 
women’s rights in the twentieth century. Identify and explain what additional type of document(s) or sources 
would help assess the impact of nationalism on women's rights. 
In your response, you will be assessed on the following. 
« Respond to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis or claim that establishes a 
line of reasoning. 
» Describe a broader historical context relevant to the prompt. 
« Support an argument in response to the prompt using all but one of the documents. 
« Use at least one additional piece of specific historical evidence (beyond that found in 
the documents) relevant to an argument about the prompt. 
- For at least three documents, explain how or why the document'’s point of view, 
purpose, historical situation, and/or audience is relevant to an argument. 
+ Use evidence to corroborate, qualify, or modify an argument that addresses the prompt. 
1. Thesis 
1 point 
Has acceptable thesis. 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
1 point 
Has acceptable thesis. 
AP World History: Modern Page 3 of 64
unit § questions 
2. Document Interpretation 
1 point 
Addresses all of the documents and demonstrates understanding of all or all but one. 
v 
0 1 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
1 point 
Addresses all of the documents and demonstrates understanding of all or all but one. 
3. Document Evidence 
2 points 
For 2 points: 
Supports thesis with appropriate evidence from all or all but one document. 
For 1 point: 
Supports thesis with appropriate evidence from all but two documents. 
v/ 
0 1 2 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
2 points 
For 2 points: 
Supports thesis with appropriate evidence from all or all but one document. 
For 1 point: 
Supports thesis with appropriate evidence from all but two documents. 
4. Point of View Analysis 
1 point 
Analyzes point of view in at least two documents. 
Page 4 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
1 point 
Analyzes point of view in at least two documents. 
5. Document Analysis 
1 point 
Analyzes documents by grouping them in two or three ways, depending on the question. 
W 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
1 point 
Analyzes documents by grouping them in two or three ways, depending on the question. 
6. Additional Documents 
1 point 
Identifies and explains the need for one type of appropriate additional document or source. 
v 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
1 point 
Identifies and explains the need for one type of appropriate additional document or source. 
Extended Core (0-2 points) 
Expands beyond basic core of 1-7 points. A student must earn 7 points in the basic core area before eamning points in the 
expanded core area. 
AP World History: Modern Page 5 of 64
unit § questions 
Examples: 
* Has a clear, analytical, and comprehensive thesis. 
* Shows careful and insightful analysis of the documents. 
* Uses documents persuasively as evidence. 
+ Analyzes point of view in most or all documents. 
+ Analyzes the documents in additional ways— groupings, comparisons, syntheses. 
« Brings in relevant “outside™ historical content. 
+ Explains why additional types of document(s) or sources are needed. 
Student response earns all of the following points. 
Expands beyond basic core of 1-7 points. A student must earn 7 points in the basic core area before earning points in the 
expanded core area. 
Examples: 
 Has a clear, analytical, and comprehensive thesis. 
+ Shows careful and insightful analysis of the documents. 
+ Uses documents persuasively as evidence. 
* Analyzes point of view in most or all documents. 
« Analyzes the documents in additional ways— groupings, comparisons, syntheses. 
« Brings in relevant “outside™ historical content. 
+ Explains why additional types of document(s) or sources are needed. 
Page 6 of 64 AP World History: Moderm 
M Scoring Guide 
unit § questions 
Image 1 
NANDALAL BOSE, INDIAN ARTIST, BAPUJI [FATHER], LINOCUT PRINT, 1930 
Bapuji, 1930 (linocut), Bose, Nandalal (1883-1966) / Private Collection / Photo © Christie’s Images / Bridgeman Images 
The print shows Mohandas Gandhi at the Dandi Salt March, one of the landmark events in Gandhi's campaign of 
nonviolent resistance to British colonial rule in India. 
Image 2 
AP World History: Modern Page 7 of 64
M Scoring Guide 
unit § questions 
ALBERTO DIAZ GUTIERREZ KORDA, CUBAN PHOTOGRAPHER, GUERRILLERO HEROICO [THE HEROIC 
GUERRILLA FIGHTER], PHOTOGRAPH, 1960 
Banque d’Images, ADAGP / Art Resource, NY © 2015 Artists Rights Society (ARS), New York / ADAGP, Paris 
The photograph shows Latin American Marxist revolutionary Ernesto [Che] Guevara. 
2. Use the following two images to answer all parts of the question that follows. 
a. ldentify ONE common historical process in the twentieth century that is reflected in both images. 
b. Explain ONE difference in the tactics individuals such as Gandhi and Che Guevara (or the groups they 
represent) adopted to achieve their political goals. 
c. Explain ONE way in which images such as these can be seen as an example of the political uses of art in 
the twentieth century. 
Part A, B, C 
Page 8 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
- Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
Question-Specific Scoring Guide 
* ONE point for identifying one common historical process in the twentieth 
century that is reflected in both images 
* ONE point for explaining one difference in the tactics individuals such as 
Gandhi and Che Guevara (or the groups they represent) adopted to achieve 
their political goals 
+ ONE point for explaining one way in which images such as these can be seen 
as an example of the political uses of art in the twentieth century 
Scoring Notes 
Examples of responses to part (a) that would earn credit: 
* Both images reflect attempts to achieve national self-determination. 
Mohandas Gandhi led the movement for India’s independence from Great 
Britain, and Che Guevara sought to overthrow United States-dominated 
governments in Latin America. 
* Both images reflect increasing challenges to the Western-dominated global 
political order, as Gandhi sought to end British domination in India and 
Guevara sought to free Latin America of United States influence. 
* Both images reflect anticolonial movements that protested against Western 
economic domination and advocated for more equitable distribution 
of wealth. 
Examples of responses to part (b) that would earn credit: 
* While both Mohandas Gandhi and Che Guevara wanted to end foreign 
influence in their respective states, Gandhi sought to retain popular support 
among India’s social classes and religious groups by advocating a traditional 
view of society in which women were subservient to men, whereas Guevara 
and other communist guerilla movements sought popular support by 
advocating economic and gender equality. 
AP World History: Modern Page 9 of 64
e Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
+ Gandhi employed economic pressure and nonviolence to influence change in 
British India, while Guevara used and promoted violent guerilla warfare as 
the best means to overthrow United States—backed regimes in Latin America. 
* Gandhi emphasized Indian nationalism and acquired broad support among 
India’s social classes, while Guevara based his rhetoric on Marxism and 
appealed to the lower classes in Latin America. 
Examples of responses to part (c) that would earn credit: 
+ Art allows political leaders to reach largely illiterate populations and thereby 
widen their base of support. 
* The depiction of revolutionary leaders as self-sacrificing participants in 
the struggle against foreign domination were meant to inspire a sense of 
nationalism and loyalty to the leader and the cause. 
* The image of Che Guevara in a military uniform with eyes focused ahead 
serves as a call to fight reminiscent of political propaganda used during the 
First and Second World Wars. 
Score 3 
Response accomplishes all three tasks set by the question. 
Question-Specific Scoring Guide 
* ONE point for identifying one common historical process in the twentieth 
century that is reflected in both images 
« ONE point for explaining one difference in the tactics individuals such as 
Gandhi and Che Guevara (or the groups they represent) adopted to achieve 
their political goals 
* ONE point for explaining one way in which images such as these can be seen 
Page 10 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
- Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
as an example of the political uses of art in the twentieth century 
Scoring Notes 
Examples of responses to part (a) that would earn credit: 
* Both images reflect attempts to achieve national self-determination. 
Mohandas Gandhi led the movement for India’s independence from Great 
Britain, and Che Guevara sought to overthrow United States-dominated 
governments in Latin America. 
+ Both images reflect increasing challenges to the Western-dominated global 
political order, as Gandhi sought to end British domination in India and 
Guevara sought to free Latin America of United States influence. 
* Both images reflect anticolonial movements that protested against Western 
economic domination and advocated for more equitable distribution 
of wealth. 
Examples of responses to part (b) that would earn credit: 
+ While both Mohandas Gandhi and Che Guevara wanted to end foreign 
influence in their respective states, Gandhi sought to retain popular support 
among India’s social classes and religious groups by advocating a traditional 
view of society in which women were subservient to men, whereas Guevara 
and other communist guerilla movements sought popular support by 
advocating economic and gender equality. 
+ Gandhi employed economic pressure and nonviolence to influence change in 
British India, while Guevara used and promoted violent guerilla warfare as 
the best means to overthrow United States—backed regimes in Latin America. 
+ Gandhi emphasized Indian nationalism and acquired broad support among 
India’s social classes, while Guevara based his rhetoric on Marxism and 
appealed to the lower classes in Latin America. 
Examples of responses to part (c) that would earn credit: 
AP World History: Modern Page 11 of 64
unit 8 questions 
+ Art allows political leaders to reach largely illiterate populations and thereby 
widen their base of support. 
* The depiction of revolutionary leaders as self-sacrificing participants in 
the struggle against foreign domination were meant to inspire a sense of 
nationalism and loyalty to the leader and the cause. 
¢ The image of Che Guevara in a military uniform with eyes focused ahead 
serves as a call to fight reminiscent of political propaganda used during the 
First and Second World Wars. 
3. In your response, be sure to address all parts of the question. Use complete sentences; an outline or bulleted list 
alone is not acceptable. 
Answer all parts of the question that follows. 
a) Explain ONE process that led to the emergence of new states in the second half of the twentieth century. 
b) Identify ONE example in which the creation of a new state led to large-scale population movements after 1945, 
c¢) Explain ONE way in which the legacy of imperialism affected the economic development of new states in the 
second half of the twentieth century. 
FRQ Score 
Each criterion is achieved independently. 
Response accomplishes all three of the tasks set by the question. 
Task A: Explain ONE process that led to the emergence of new states in the second half of the twentieth 
century. 
The course framework ofien allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching 
the course content. As a result, responses may vary. Some examples that would earn credit include: 
- Decolonization was a process that led to the emergence of new states in the second half of the twentieth 
century because states in Africa and Asia gained independence from colonial powers such as Britain and 
France. 
- The emergence of nationalist, religious, and ethnic movements in Africa and Asia led to the creation of 
Page 12 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
new states because they helped end colomial rule. 
- The spread of communism in Asia led to the creation of new states on either side of the ideological 
divide, such as North and South Korea and the People’s Republic of China and Taiwan. 
- The collapse of the Soviet Union in the late twentieth century led to the creation of new states in the 
Baltic region, the Caucasus, and Central Asia. 
Task B: ldentify ONE example in which the creation of a new state led to large-scale population 
movements after 1945, 
The course framework ofien allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching 
the course content. As a result, responses may vary. Some examples that would earn credit include: 
- The creation of Pakistan following the partition of India led to large-scale population movements by 
Muslims and Hindus. 
- The creation of the state of Israel led to the immigration of European Jews and the displacement of 
large numbers of Palestinians. 
- The creation of Bangladesh in the early 1970s led to large-scale population movements as many Hindus 
and Muslims fled to India. 
Task C: Explain ONE way in which the legacy of imperialism affected the economic development of 
new states in the second half of the twentieth century. 
The course framework ofien allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching 
the course content. As a result, responses may vary. Some examples that would earn credit include: 
- The legacy of imperialism affected the economic development of new states because many new states 
took a stronger role in guiding economic policy and often nationalized industries in order to weaken the 
influence of Western states and companies in their national economies. 
- The legacy of imperialism affected economic development in new states because Western European 
companies often retained considerable economic power. 
- The legacy of imperialism persisted because economic development and trade relationships established 
under imperial rule often tended to dictate the economic development of postcolonial states, such as 
Algeria. 
- Economic development in new states was affected by migration to colonial metropoles. These 
migrations could either hurt new states’ economies because of the loss of potential skilled workers, 
intellectuals, and government officials, or it could help those economies if those migrants returned and 
brought with them skills that could help their national economies develop. 
AP World History: Modern Page 13 of 64
unit § questions 
“It was my privilege to attend the All African People’s Conference held in Ghana. The conference was significant because 
it brought together the most representative gathering of African leaders ever assembled. There were about 300 delegates 
representing some 65 organizations coming from 28 African countries. Of the nine independent African countries only 
one, Sudan, was not represented. 
The nationalist organizations were represented by their top leadership. Therefore, whether the colonial powers like it or 
not, the decisions of the conference must be taken with some seriousness. The conference announced clearly that African 
freedom and independence are a necessity, and that the struggle to achieve independence would continue. The 
conference’s declaration on colonialism and imperialism significantly called upon ‘the independent African states to 
render maximum assistance by every means possible to the dependent peoples in their struggle.” The final decision of the 
conference was to commend nonviolent methods but also to endorse other methods if they are deemed necessary. 
Presently, there is negligible Russian influence in Africa. Nevertheless, this influence will grow unless the problem of 
racism in the multi-racial areas of Africa is solved. It is my opinion that American influence will decline steadily unless 
the United States is much more vocal in its support of responsible movements for independence in Africa. The United 
States does not need to be as cautious as it currently 1s.” 
George M. Houser, president of the American Committee on Africa, a nongovernmental organization founded to support nonviolent African 
independence movements, report about the All African People’s Conference held in Ghana, 1958 
4.  The conference as described in the first and second paragraphs is best explained in the context of which of the 
following developments in the aftermath of the Second World War? 
(A) The development of regional free-trade agreements 
(B) The intensification of ethnic rivalries in Africa 
(C) The spread of industrial methods of production 
(D) The dissolution of European empires v/ 
Answer D 
Correct. The conference is best explained in the context of the dissolution of European empires following 
the Second World War. The Second World War weakened European control over African and Asian 
colonies and led to the dissolution of European empires, largely because Great Britain and France were 
so devastated economically and physically during the Second World War that they could no longer 
afford to maintain their vast empires intact and had to allow certain colonies to become independent. 
Nationalist leaders in Africa and Asia recognized this weakness and applied economic, military, and 
diplomatic pressure on European states to relinquish the remainder of their colonies. 
5. The conference’s decision to “endorse other methods,” as mentioned in the second Eamgragh, is best explained in 
the context of which of the following? 
Page 14 of 64 AP World History: Moderm 
unit § questions 
The growth of the international arms trade provided armed groups in Africa with military superiority 
(A) over European powers. 
(B) Many African colonies had failed to obtain the greater self-governance promised after the First World it 
War and doubted that European powers would fulfill similar promises after the Second World War. 
(©) Many African societies had been strongly influenced by European methods of administration, economic 
and political philosophy, and culture. 
(D) The Non-Aligned Movement was attractive to many African societies that opposed both European 
policies in Africa and the development of a bipolar global order. 
Answer B 
Correct. European colonial powers justified the creation of the mandate system after the First World War 
as part of a process of preparing African states for self-government but had made few moves to grant 
African nations their independence. As a result, some African nationalists contended that further pressure 
on European governments through military force was necessary to achieve independence. 
6.  The author’s opinion in the third paragraph regarding the caution that the United States was employing in 
supporting African independence movements is most directly explained in the context of which of the following 
developments in the immediate aftermath of the Second World War? 
(A) The United States had vastly more economic and military power than its European allies. v 
(B) The United States and the Soviet Union preferred to engage in proxy wars rather than in direct conflict. 
The United States used its influence in international organizations to rally support for its policies in 
(€ Third World nations. 
(D) The United States used its intelligence agencies to overthrow regimes in Third World nations. 
Answer A 
Correct. Shortly after the Second World War, the United States possessed nearly 50 percent of the 
world’s gross domestic product (GDP) and possessed a military that dwarfed that of any of its European 
allies. In addition, United States military support was essential for protecting Western European states 
against potential Soviet military aggression. Hence, Houser’s contention that the United States did not 
need to be so cautious in supporting African independence movements most likely reflects his belief that 
the United States alliances with European states would not fracture because European nations would 
remain militarily and economically dependent on the United States. 
AP World History: Modern Page 15 of 64
e Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
Source | 
CUBAN TANK TROOPS IN ANGOLA, FIGHTING ON THE SIDE OF THE PROCOMMUNIST PEOPLE’S 
MOVEMENT FOR THE LIBERATION OF ANGOLA (MPLA) DURING THE ANGOLAN CIVIL WAR, 
CIRCA 1980 
Fred Bridgland / Casemate Publishers / mediadrumworlcdom  
Source 2 
Page 16 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
M Scoring Guide 
unit § questions 
SOUTH AFRICAN ANTIAIRCRAFT UNIT IN ANGOLA, FIGHTING ON THE SIDE OF THE 
ANTICOMMUNIST NATIONAL UNION FOR THE TOTAL INDEPENDENCE OF ANGOLA (UNITA) 
DURING THE ANGOLAN CIVIL WAR, CIRCA 1980 
Fred Bridgland / Casemate Publishers / mediadrumworld. com 
7.  Which of the following developments or processes in the late twentieth century best explains the participation of 
foreign troops in the Angolan Civil War, as shown in the two photographs? 
(A) The creation of the Non-Aligned Movement 
\ (B) The proliferation of Cold War proxy conflicts v 
( (C) The global campaign against apartheid in South Africa 
(D) The emergence of ideologically driven movements advocating violence against civilians 
Answer B 
Correct. The two photographs show soldiers from communist Cuba and the Western-aligned South 
African Republic participating in the Angolan Civil War. To avoid direct conflict that could lead to a 
nuclear war, the United States and the Soviet Union used their respective allies, in what are referred to as 
proxy conflicts, to help fulfill their ideological and political objectives. 
AP World History: Modern Page 17 of 64
unit § questions 
8.  The confrontation illustrated in the two photographs can be seen as a specific example of the global rivalries in the 
period after 1945 that also directly produced which of the following? 
(A) The NATO and Warsaw Pact military alliances v 
(B) The Arab-Israeli conflicts 
(C) The Hutu-Tutsi ethnic tensions that led to the Rwanda genocide 
(D) Regional economic cooperation blocs, such as the EEC, ASEAN, and Mercosur 
| Answer A 
Correct. The NATO and Warsaw Pact military alliances formed directly in response to Cold War 
tensions between anticommunist states in Western Europe that were supported by the United States and 
communist satellite states in Eastern Europe supported by the Soviet Union. NATO formed as a result of 
United States attempts to protect Western Europe from a potential Soviet attack, while the Warsaw Pact 
in Eastern Europe formed under Soviet leadership to counter the threat posed by NATO. 
9. Which of the following developments in the period after 1945 most directly prevented localized conflicts such as 
the one illustrated in the two photographs from escalating into global wars? 
(A) The threat of the use of nuclear weapons i 
(B) The effectiveness of the United Nations as a global guarantor of collective security 
(C) Recurring economic downturns, such as the one following the 1973 OPEC oil embargo 
(D) The threat of communist revolutions breaking out in the industrialized countries of the West 
| Answer A 
Correct. The potential for mutually assured destruction through the use of nuclear weapons prevented 
direct conflict between the United States and the Soviet Union during the Cold War. Hence, although the 
United States and the Soviet Union often placed considerable economic and military resources into 
localized proxy wars like the Angolan Civil War and saw those conflicts as essential to achieving their 
respective geopolitical and ideological objectives, they avoided direct conflict with each other. 
Page 18 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
“Throughout the period of Nigeria’s short and precarious existence as a single political entity, we Eastern Nigerians have 
always believed in fundamental human rights as they are accepted and enjoyed in civilized countries. Impelled by our 
belief in these rights and our sense of common citizenship with other Nigerians, we contributed our ideas and skills, our 
resourcefulness and dynamism, in the development of areas of Nigeria outside the East. We set up businesses and 
industries throughout the country, overlooked the neglect of our homeland in the division of national institutions, 
development projects, and financial resources, made our region’s abundant natural resources available to the rest of the 
country, and confidently invested in the general economic and social development of Nigeria. . . . 
We used to oppose those who told us that what our former colonial masters made into “Nigeria® was merely an 
agglomeration of different peoples, distinct in every way except in the color of their skin, and organized in as a unit solely 
for the commercial interests and administrative convenience of the colonists. . . . 
But we have come to realize that national unity is no longer possible. The Nigerian constitution that was adopted after 
independence in 1960 installed the North in perpetual dominance over Nigeria. Thus were sown, by design or by default, 
the seeds of factionalism and hate, of struggle for power, and the worst type of political deception. National independence 
was followed by successive crises, each leading to the near disintegration of the country. Last year alone, tens of 
thousands of Eastern and Southern Nigerians were killed in pogroms by Northerners in all parts of the country, including 
the capital, Lagos. We are now facing a situation in which there are only two possible outcomes: either perpetual 
domination of the rest of the country by the North, not by consent but by force and fraud, or a dissolution of the [Nigerian] 
federation bond.” 
Lieutenant Colonel C. Odumegwu Qjukwu, Nigerian army officer, proclamation of the breakaway Republic of Biafra [Eastern Nigeria], 1967 
10. Which of the following best explains Lt. Colonel Ojukwu’s purpose in including the information in the first 
paragraph in his independence proclamation? 
(A) He wanted to emphasize the continued economic exploitation of Nigeria by Western global capitalism. 
(B) He wanted to convince Nigeria’s elected government to compensate Eastern Nigerians for the economic 
sacrifices they had made in building the country. 
(©) He wanted to advocate for a pan-African solution to the continent’s pressing economic and social 
problems. 
(D) He wanted to outline a list of East Nigerian grievances in order to justify the political action he was v 
about to take. 
Answer D 
Correct. Lt. Colonel Ojukwu wanted to outline Eastern Nigerian grievances in order to justify rebelling 
against the Nigerian government to fight for the independence of Eastern Nigeria. 
11. Which of the following best explains how the immediate historical situation of the proclamation of Biafran 
independence from Nigeria informed the author’s statements in the third paragraph? 
AP World History: Modern Page 19 of 64
unit 8 questions 
Explicitly seeking the support of one of the two superpowers was the expected course of action from 
A : . : b 
(A) most new national governments in Asia and Africa. 
Claiming to uphold the rule of law and oppose government corruption had become the norm for those it 
(B) seeking political power, even for military leaders seeking to challenge elected governments. 
Presenting their struggle as one against European imperialism was the best way for leaders of African 
(© and Asian states to justify their corrupt practices. 
Adopting the principles of the Non-Aligned Movement allowed many leaders of new states in Asia and 
(D) Africa to remain above the proxy conflicts of the Cold War. 
Answer B 
Correct. Lt. Colonel Ojukwu’s listing of the Biafran grievances against the Northern-dominated federal 
government of Nigeria directly demonstrates that even as a military leader seeking to challenge or 
overturn an elected government, he feels compelled to invoke the rhetoric of upholding the rule of law 
and embracing the principles of good government. 
12. Based on the author’s point of view, it is most likely that the information presented in the passage 
(A) understates the economic contributions Eastern Nigerians had made to the unified Nigerian state 
(B) inadvertently misrepresents the extent of regional differences and identities in Nigerian society 
glosses over the responsibility of corrupt politicians in creating the problems facing the unified Nigerian 
© state 
overstates the extent to which Northern Nigerians were responsible for undermining the united Nigerian _~ 
D) state 
Answer D 
Correct. Because Lt. Colonel Ojukwu was advocating for the use of force to separate Eastern Nigeria 
from the rest of the country, he most likely presented information that overstated the extent to which 
Northern Nigerians were responsible for undermining the united Nigerian state. 
Page 20 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
WORLD POLITICAL MAP, 1980 
[ The United States and its Allies 
The Soviet Union and its Allies 
» Proxy conflict between forces supported 
by the United States and the Soviet Union 
13. The global balance of power, alluded to on the map, best reflects which of the following changes in the mid- 
twentieth century? 
(A) The ability of the United States and the Soviet Union to develop economic policies that protected them 
from the worst effects of the Great Depression 
(B) The disintegration of imperial states such as the Ottoman and Austro-Hungarian Empires following the 
First World War 
© The military and economic decline of Western European colonial empires following the Second World ~_ ~ 
War 
The United States and Soviet Union'’s control over international financial institutions such as the 
(D) International Monetary Fund 
Answer C 
Correct. As Western European military and economic power declined after the Second World War, the 
Soviet Union and the United States became the world’s superpowers, and most states around the world 
allied with one or the other power, as the map illustrates. 
14. Which of the following likely explains the political positions of most of the nonaligned Asian and African states 
shown on the map? 
AP World History: Modern Page 21 of 64
unit 8 questions 
(A) As former colonial territories, they were wary of being dominated by another foreign power. v 
As former large empires, they admired the territorial ambitions of the United States and the Soviet 
®) Union. 
As states that had populations with deeply traditional values, they were uninterested in ideological 
©) debates between capitalists and communists. 
(D) As states with extensive natural resources, they wanted to grant free-trade privileges to all nations. 
Answer A 
Correct. Because of their past histories as colonial territories under European rule, nonaligned states such 
as India and Ghana were wary of becoming too closely allied with either the United States or the Soviet 
Union, two nations that frequently used their economic and military power to overthrow governments 
and shape the economic and foreign policies of other states. 
15. Which of the following best explains why the United States and the Soviet Union preferred to engage in the type of 
conflicts shown on the map? 
(A) To maintain control over their former colonial states through puppet governments 
| (B) To avoid direct military confrontations that could lead to nuclear war v/ 
(C) To obtain new military technology before a direct confrontation 
(D) To acquire natural resources by forcing states to favor United States or Soviet companies 
I Answer B 
Correct. Because both powers controlled nuclear weapons, direct military conflict might result in nuclear 
war, which had the potential to destroy both nations entirely. Therefore, they engaged in proxy conflicts 
all over the world to increase their power and influence. 
16. All of the following contributed to the end of the political order depicted on the map EXCEPT 
(A) the expansion of United States military spending 
(B) the unsuccessful Soviet military intervention in Afghanistan 
(C) continued economic weakness in the Soviet Union following Gorbachev’s reforms 
(D) armed rebellions in Eastern European states against Soviet rule v 
Page 22 of 64 AP World History: Moderm 
unit § questions 
Answer D 
Correct. While Eastern European states did protest against Soviet rule in the late 1980s, and their protests 
undoubtedly played an important part in the fall of the Soviet Union, these protests were not armed 
rebellions but predominately peaceful demonstrations. 
“Africa was the last region to break the bondage of colonialism. It was not until [after] World War II that most African 
countries achieved independence.... Many African countries became pawns in the Cold War’s division of the world, and 
social and economic development took second place to issues related to national security policies of Western countries. 
Africa’s boundaries were drawn arbitrarily at the Berlin Conference of 188485 when Great Britain, France, Belgium, 
Italy, Portugal, Germany, and Spain [ignored] a thousand indigenous cultures and superimposed a new map that supported 
the economic desires of the imperial powers. Colonial powers were interested in extracting resources, not building 
schools, infrastructure and public institutions. Often, colonial leaders treated their “subjects’ as subhuman.” 
Source: Margee Ensign and William Bertrand, United States historians of Africa, Rwanda: History and Hope, 2010 
17.  Which of the following is an argument made by the authors in the first paragraph regarding the Cold War? 
(A) Many countries joined the Non-Aligned Movement to avoid making alliances with the superpowers. 
The United States and the Soviet Union attempted to expand their empires by conquering territories in 
(B) Africa. 
(©) Global competition between the superpowers interfered with the advancement of newly independent Wy 
countries in Africa. 
(D) The proliferation of nuclear weapons threatened the existence of African countries. 
Answer C 
Correct. The authors contend Western governments prioritized Cold-War security over African economic 
and social development. 
18. The events described in the first paragraph were part of which of the following broader historical processes? 
AP World History: Modern Page 23 of 64
unit 8 questions 
(A) After the Second World War, the United States assisted many nations with their rebuilding efforts. 
Many former European colonies achieved self-government either peacefully or through armed i 
(B) resistance. 
(C) The Soviet Union implemented oppressive policies to exert greater control over its population. 
(D) Improvements in transportation and communication technologies contributed to the globalization of the 
world economy. 
I Answer B 
Correct. The authors note Africa was "the last region to break the bond of colonialism," referring to the 
wave of post-1945 decolonization that dismantled European empires across the continent. 
19. In China between 1958 and 1962, Mao Zedong’s Great Leap Forward, an effort to make China an industrial power 
through mass collectivization of agriculture, is best understood as an example of 
(A) an attempt by China to win favor with policy makers in the United States 
(B) a free-market policy designed to position China as a major power in a globalizing economy 
(© market communism in which the state increasingly cedes control to businesses run by Communist Party 
assoclates 
(D) acommunist government exerting control over the national economy v 
“It seems that the only way we have of opposing totalitarianism is to reject its lies and start living the truth. Of course, to 
oppose the government in a society such as ours is very different from opposing a democratic government in an open 
society. In a repressive society such as ours dissent must start first on the level of individual thinking and conscience, 
rather than actual political action. The power of our opposition to the Communist regime is, for now, a potential power, 
which is hidden throughout the whole of society. But once enough members of society have joined our ranks, then this 
potential power can spring forth (when, where, and under what circumstances it is difficult to predict) into something 
visible: a real act of political protest, a social movement, a sudden explosion of civil unrest. This is why the regime 
persecutes dissidents for even the most modest attempts to tell the truth. 
Why was Solzhenitsyn* driven out of his own country? Certainly not because he wielded any real power or because any 
of the regime’s representatives felt he might unseat them and take their place in government. No—Solzhenitsyn’s 
expulsion was a desperate attempt to plug up a wellspring of truth which the regime feared might one day produce 
unpredictable consequences. They feared Solzhenitsyn because they realized that the crust of lies they have built around 
us is very fragile. As long as it seals off completely the entire society, it appears to be made of stone. But the moment 
someone breaks through in one place, when one person cries out, “The king has no clothes!” then everything suddenly 
appears in another light and the whole system can suddenly find itself on the verge of disintegrating.” 
*a Soviet writer who wrote books exposing the oppressive policies of Stalinism 
Vaclav Havel, Czechoslovak writer and dissident, The Power of the Powerless, essay written in 1978 and distributed as an underground publication 
in Soviet bloc countries 
Page 24 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
20. The passage can best be used to illustrate which of the following developments in the 1970s and 1980s? 
The way in which squabbles among party leaders and intraparty power rivalries gradually undermined 
) the legitimacy of communist regimes in Eastern Europe 
The way in which the mobilization of society during the Cold War gave people in Eastern Europe the 
(B) strength to endure economic hardships 
The way in which the liberalization of Soviet policies following the death of Stalin allowed people in the 
(© Eastern bloc to express a wide variety of opinions and viewpoints 
(D) The way in which government efforts to suppress criticism and restrict freedom of speech proved 4 
meffective in stemming public discontent within communist regimes 
Answer D 
Correct. Communist regimes in Eastern Europe did attempt to stifle critiques and free speech, even with 
military crackdowns such as that in Hungary in 1956 and in Czechoslovakia following the Prague Spring 
in 1968. However, they were never able to stop all dissent, and by the 1970s and 1980s more people 
within communist states were expressing discontent publicly. 
21. Asexpressed in the passage, Havel’s vision of effecting change in the communist bloc was most consistent with 
which of the following developments? 
State-led programs to increase press freedom and provide greater transparency on past and present 
(4) political decisions, such as Gorbachev’s glasnost policies 
Market-oriented measures to stimulate private initiative and make state-run plants and factories more 
(B) competitive, such as Deng Xiaoping’s economic reforms in China 
(©) Grassroots citizens’ organizations forming to protest the economic and social injustices in the v 
Communist bloe, such as the Solidarity labor union in Poland 
(D) Violent disintegration of states deemed illegitimate or artificially created, such as the collapse of 
Yugoslavia 
Answer C 
Correct. Havel writes about change beginning with dissent at the level of individual thinking, which 
could then lead to public protest or a social movement. Grassroots citizens’ organizations such as the 
Solidarity labor movement in Poland were examples of how dissent from individuals could provoke 
collective action that would form into a social movement to protest injustices and eventually lead to 
political change. 
AP World History: Modern Page 25 of 64
unit 8 questions 
22. In addition to the factors exemplified by the passage, the end of the Cold War was also directly hastened by all of 
the following EXCEPT 
(A) United States military and diplomatic pressure on the Soviet Union 
(B) adeepening economic crisis as a result of a downturn in oil prices 
(C) the signing of nuclear arms control treaties between the United States and the Soviet Union v/ 
(D) the costly and ultimately unsuccessful Soviet invasion of Afghanistan 
Answer C 
Correct. Although the United States and the Soviet Union did sign nuclear arms control treaties in the 
1970s and the 1980s, these treaties did not directly lead to the end of the Cold War. Since this option 
represents a factor that did not lead to the end of the Cold War, it is the correct answer to this question. 
23. “Total war was no longer a rational option for enemies armed with nuclear weapons. If they were to fight each other, 
they could only do so in limited wars or through nonnuclear client states. Ironically, then, weapons of total destruction 
may have rendered total war between major powers obsolete in the late twentieth century.” 
Merry 
Wiesner- 
Hanks, 
world 
historian, 
2004 
Which of the following occurrences during the Cold War best supports the main contention of the passage above? 
Both the United States and the Soviet Union actively sought ways to neutralize each other’s nuclear 
(A) missiles. 
Both the United States and the Soviet Union armed and supported rival countries and factions in Africa, 
(B) Asia, and Latin America. 
A large movement protesting the nuclear arms buildup developed in Western Europe and the United 
© States. 
(D) Several nonaligned countries sought to obtain nuclear weapons technology. 
Page 26 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
“The Soviet structure of power is committed to the perfection of the dictatorship and to maintaining the concept that 
Russia is in a state of siege, with an enemy that lies just beyond the walls. This mentality has profound implications for 
Russia’s international conduct. Moscow assumes that the aims of the capitalist world are antagonistic to the Soviet 
regime. However, the Kremlin is under no compulsion to accomplish its goal of spreading its influence in a hurry. If it 
finds unassailable barriers in its path, it accepts them and accommodates itself to them. There is no trace of any feeling in 
Soviet psychology that that goal must be reached at any given time. 
In these circumstances it is clear that the main element of any United States policy toward the Soviet Union must be that 
of patient and vigilant containment of Russian expansive tendencies. Soviet economic development, while it can list 
certain formidable achievements, has been precariously spotty and uneven. It is difficult to see how the deficiencies of the 
Soviet economic system can be corrected by a tired and dispirited population working largely under the shadow of fear 
and compulsion. And as long as they are not overcome, Russia will remain an economically vulnerable and impotent 
nation, capable of exporting its ideological enthusiasm but unable to export real evidence of material power and 
prosperity. Indeed, it is the strong belief of this writer that Soviet power bears within it the seeds of its own decay, and 
that the sprouting of these seeds is well advanced.” 
George F. Kennan, United States diplomat to the Soviet Union from 1944 to 1946, article submitted anonymously to an academic journal devoted to 
the conduet of foreign policy, published in Washington, D.C., 1947 
24, The recommendation provided in the second paragraph is best explained in the context of which of the following 
historical situations in the aftermath of the Second World War? 
(A) The emergence of fascist states engaged in territorial expansion in Asia and Africa 
(B) The implementation of genocidal policies by totalitarian states 
(C) The creation of secret competing alliance systems by European powers 
(D) The attempts by Soviet officials to establish ideological ties with newly independent states v 
Answer D 
Correct. At the time Kennan wrote in 1947, in the aftermath of the Second World War, the United States 
and the Soviet Union had emerged as the world’s two superpowers, and both states were engaged in a 
global ideological struggle to spread their influence and power. 
25. Which of the following best explains the purpose of the arguments expressed in the passage? 
(A) To influence Soviet government officials to adopt economic policies that would harm the Soviet Union 
(B) To influence United States government officials to adopt policies designed to avoid a major war v/ 
(C) To convince world leaders to unite in order to stop the evils of communism 
To convince Soviet citizens that the United States meant them no harm in the hopes of creating a 
(@) sustainable peace 
AP World History: Modern Page 27 of 64
unit § questions 
Answer B 
Correct. By publishing an article in a journal devoted to the conduct of foreign policy, Kennan was 
clearly attempting to advise government officials in the United States to take a certain policy 
approach—the containment of Soviet expansion—as part of a long-term strategy to outlast a Soviet 
Union that Kennan believes will eventually collapse from its own internal weaknesses. 
26. Which of the following best explains how the historical circumstances of Kennan’s service as a diplomat in the 
Soviet Union influenced his point of view regarding the “Soviet structure of power” in the first paragraph? 
He witnessed how the Soviet Union used its industrial capabilities to produce vastly more quantities of 
(A) war equipment than Germany could produce. 
He witnessed how German atrocities had turned ethnic groups within the Soviet Union who had initially 
(B) opposed Stalin against the Nazis. 
He witnessed how the Soviet Union’s defeat of Nazi Germany allowed it to decide the fate of states in 
© Eastern Europe that it occupied. 
He witnessed how conflict between Germany and the Soviet Union allowed Stalin to further centralize 
®) his power and use Russian nationalism to mobilize the population. 
Answer D 
Correct. Stalin framed the Soviet Union’s fight against Nazi Germany as a national fight to defend the 
motherland rather than as a communist fight against imperialism. Stalin’s use of Russian nationalism 
helped to unify the population against the foreign enemy, and the needs of wartime management allowed 
Stalin to centralize his power at the same time. As a diplomat resident in Moscow, Kennan would have 
directly witnessed this process, and it likely strongly influenced his argument that the Soviet Union was 
dedicated to constantly perfecting its dictatorship and to maintaining the concept that Russia was in a 
state of siege. 
Page 28 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
Source 1 
“I assume that you, like any other sane man in this nuclear age, would not want to deliberately plunge the world into war, 
which could only result in catastrophic consequences to the whole world, including the aggressor. 
At our [meetings], | made clear that because of the ideology to which you adhere, the United States could not tolerate any 
action on your part which in a major way disturbed the existing balance of power in the world. 
I stated that if certain developments in Cuba took place, the United States would do whatever must be done to protect its 
own security and that of its allies. Despite this, the rapid deployment of [Soviet] long-range missiles in Cuba has 
proceeded.” 
Source: Letter from United States President John F. Kennedy to Soviet leader Nikita Khrushchev, October 22, 1962 
Source 2 
“I assure you that your conclusions regarding offensive weapons on Cuba are groundless. We have differences on 
ideological questions. But these must be solved on the basis of peaceful competition. The continued peaceful coexistence 
of the two different social-political systems now existing in the world is necessary to assure a stable peace. 
We have received proposals [to avoid war] from the Acting Secretary General of the UN; | consider these proposals 
reasonable. You and | understand perfectly what terrible forces our countries possess.” 
Source: Response from Khrushchev to Kennedy, October 26, 1962 
1:In October 1962, the United States and the Soviet Union became involved in the Cuban missile crisis, caused by Soviet 
efforts to install nuclear missiles in Cuba.= 
27. Expensive military competition and proxy conflicts between the superpowers, such as the one referenced in the 
sources, contributed most directly to which of the following in the late twentieth century? 
(A) The collapse of the Soviet Union v/ 
(B) The nse of communism in Latin America 
(C) The establishment of the United Nations 
(D) The increasing isolationism of the United States 
Answer A 
Correct. The Soviet Union’s collapse can be attributed to costly wars and lack of success in proxy 
conflicts with the United States and its allies. 
AP World History: Modern Page 29 of 64
unit 8 questions 
28. The two sources best support which of the following claims? 
(A) The Soviet Union planned to establish settler colonies on the island of Cuba. 
(B) Both the United States and the Soviet Union attempted to join the Non-Aligned Movement. 
| (C) The Cold War superpowers were engaged in a power struggle involving postcolonial states. v 
(D) The Soviet Union never placed any long-range missiles on Cuba’s territory. 
l Answer C 
Correct. The reference to “the existing balance of power in the world™ along with the debate about Soviet 
ability to influence Cuba found in the sources indicates the United States and Soviet Union were engaged 
in a power struggle involving postcolonial states such as Cuba. 
29, Kennedy’s reference in Source 1 to the United States needing to protect “its own security and that of its allies” can 
be best understood in the context of which of the following? 
(A) NAFTA was created as a free trade zone for Mexico, Canada, and the United States. 
(B) During the Second World War, the United States joined an alliance against Nazi Germany. 
(C) The Warsaw Pact included several of the Eastern and central European socialist states. 
(D) During the Cold War, NATO policies were focused on the threats posed by the Soviet Union. v 
Answer D 
Correct. The United States and its allies were concerned with limiting the threats posed by the Soviet 
Union and the United States was a member of NATO when these letters were exchanged between 
Kennedy and Khrushchev. 
30. The “two different social-political systems” referenced by Khrushchev in Source 2 were 
(A) national socialism and constitutional monarchy 
(B) democratic capitalism and communism v/ 
(C) fascism and imperialism 
(D) military dictatorship and theocratic republic 
Page 30 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit § questions 
Answer B 
Correct. The democracy of the United States and its allies and the communism of the Soviet Union and 
its allies were the two dominant social-political systems of the Cold War. 
31.  Which of the following best represents a point of view shared by both leaders? 
(A) The United States should be able to place missiles on Cuba. 
| (B) Nuclear war would be devastating to both the Soviet Union and the United States. v/ 
(C) Nuclear war between the Cold War superpowers was inevitable. 
(D) A war would not affect the civilian populations of either the United States or the Soviet Union. 
I Answer B 
Correct. Kennedy’s discussion of war in the first paragraph of Source 1, along with Khrushchev’s 
reference to the “terrible forces our countries possess,” show that both sides were aware of the 
consequences of nuclear war. 
“|TASS News Agency]: How is the United Nations Security Council decision on the rapid withdrawal of Belgian troops 
from the Congo being fulfilled? 
[Patrice Lumumba]: Belgium has already proved that she has no respect for Security Council decisions. The Belgian 
government 1s continuing its aggressive actions and savage reprisals against our people who seek their independence from 
Belgian rule. These facts are not widely known in the world because the Belgian colonialists have got the press of other 
Western countries to write as little as possible about the actions of Belgian soldiers in the Congo. 
[TASS News Agency]: What is the Congolese people’s view of the Soviet Union’s stand on the Congo’s struggle to attain 
genuine independence and territorial integrity? 
[Patrice Lumumba]: The Soviet Union was the only great power whose stand conformed to our people’s will and desire. 
That 1s why the Soviet Union was the only great power that has all along been supporting the Congolese people’s struggle 
with weapons and military advisors, while the West similarly supports Belgium. I should like to convey the heartfelt 
gratitude of the entire Congolese people to the Soviet people.” 
Patrice Lumumba, leader of Congolese independence movement, interview with the Soviet news agency TASS, July 1960 
32.  Which of the following most likely explains the Soviet Union’s motivation for being involved in the Congo as 
described in the passage? 
AP World History: Modern Page 31 of 64
unit 8 questions 
(A) It wanted to establish its own colonies to extract natural resources for its industrial factories. 
(B) It wanted to take advantage of a regional conflict to expand its military power and ideological influence. v/ 
(C) It wanted to expand its economic power by establishing free-trade agreements with dependent states. 
(D) It wanted to promote greater stability in Third World countries by ending regional conflicts. 
Answer B 
Correct. The Soviet Union’s desire to support the Congolese can most closely be attributed to its desire 
to expand its ideological and military influence, seen both through its supplying of arms and military 
advisors to the Congolese people and its desire to distinguish its actions from those of the West. 
33. The level of military engagement between Western nations and the Soviet Union referred to in the passage is best 
explained by which of the following developments after the Second World War? 
The economic decline of communist states made it impossible for them to transport large armies to 
) distant regions. 
The ability of the United Nations to send peace-keeping forces limited the scale of the involvement of 
(B) major military powers in regional conflicts. 
The continued importance of resource-rich regions in Africa to economic development in the West and 
(C) the Soviet Union discouraged them from engaging in large-scale conflicts that could cause vast 
destruction. 
(D) The possession of nuclear weapons by the United States and the Soviet Union made it too dangerous for  ~ 
Western nations and the Soviet Union to engage in large-scale military conflict with each other. 
l Answer D 
Correct. Because both the Western powers and the Soviet Union possessed nuclear weapons, the 
principles of Mutually Assured Destruction ensured that the two sides avoided direct military conflict to 
prevent nuclear war. Instead, as indicated in this passage, the two sides challenged each other indirectly 
in other parts of the world, such as the Congo, through proxies. 
34. Which of the following explains the most significant difference between the circumstances of military competition 
between Western nations and the Soviet Union in developing regions such as Africa and the circumstances of 
military competition between Western nations and the Soviet Union in Europe in the late twentieth century? 
Page 32 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
Unlike in Africa, military competition between Western nations and the Soviet Union in Europe g 
) involved the establishment of rival military blocs. 
Unlike in Europe, military competition between Western nations and the Soviet Union in Africa 
(B) involved covert military actions by rival intelligence agencies. 
Unlike in Europe, military competition between Western nations and the Soviet Union in Africa 
© mvolved the establishment of puppet regimes. 
Unlike in Africa, military competition between Western nations and the Soviet Union in Europe 
(D) involved using political propaganda to weaken states. 
Answer A 
Correct. Military competition in Europe occurred within the framework of rival military blocs, namely, 
NATO and the Warsaw Pact. However, in developing regions such as Africa, no such military blocs 
existed. While some countries would become allied with either great power, competing, formal military 
alliances did not materialize. 
“Article 1. The feudal marriage system, which is based on the superiority of man over woman, is abolished. The New 
Democratic marriage system is based on free choice of partners, on equal rights for both sexes, and on protection of the 
lawful interests of women and children. . . . 
Article 3. Marriage shall be based on the complete willingness of the two parties. 
Article 7. Husband and wife shall have equal status in the home. . . . 
Article 8. Husband and wife are bound to love, respect, and assist each other, to engage in production, to care for the 
children, and to strive jointly for the building up of a new society. 
Article 9. Husband and wife shall both have the right to free choice of occupation and free choice of participation in work 
or in social activities.” 
Marriage law from the People’s Republic of China, 1950 
35. The characterization of the traditional Chinese marriage system in Article 1 most likely reflects which of the 
following? 
(A) Chinese nationalists” emphasis on the unity of Chinese territory 
(B) The influence of Buddhist teachings on Chinese culture 
(C) Chinese elites’ adoption of Western gender norms following the Opium Wars 
(D) The Marxist ideology of Mao Zedong’s government in China v 
AP World History: Modern Page 33 of 64
unit 8 questions 
Answer D 
Correct. The first article’s description of traditional Chinese marriages as “feudal” and the insistence on 
establishing a “New Democratic” marriage reflects how Chinese communists attempted to radically 
break from what they saw as backward traditions. 
J6. 1In 1949 NATO was established so that Western leaders could counter 
(A) the perceived threat that the Soviet Union and its allies would spread communism v 
(B) free-market advocates in the United States and Great Britain 
(C) the decolonization of Africa and nationalization of Western industry there 
(D) the growing power of developing countries in the United Nations 
37. The founding North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) is best understood in the context of which of the 
following? 
(A) The Cold War v 
(B) The growth of a globalized economy 
(C) The establishment of the Nonaligned Movement 
(D) The post-Second World War population boom 
Page 34 of 64 AP World History: Moderm 
e Scoring Guide 
unit 8 questions 
NUMBER OF NUCLEAR BOMBS OR WARHEADS BY NATION, 1945 TO 2000 
Russia or 
Year United States Other Nations Total 
Soviet Union 
1945 2 2 
1950 299 5 304 
1955 2422 200 10 2,632 
1960 18,638 1,627 105 20,370 
1965 31,139 6,144 308 37,591 
1970 26,008 11,736 486 38,230 
1975 27,519 19,235 888 47,642 
1980 24,104 30,665 986 55,755 
1985 23,368 38,582 974 62,924 
1990 21,392 32,980 1,404 55,776 
1995 10,904 18,179 1,031 30,114 
2000 10,577 12,188 1,081 23,846 
Data adapted from https://ourworldindata.org/nuclear-weapons. 
38. The pattern in the numbers of nuclear weapons shown in the table between 1945 and 1985 is best understood in 
which of the following contexts? 
(A) Decolonization of empires in Asia and Africa 
(B) Competition between Western and communist powers 
(C) The second industrial revolution 
(D) The outbreak of the Second World War 
Answer B 
Correct. Competition between Western and communist powers drove the proliferation of nuclear 
AP World History: Modern Page 35 of 64
unit § questions 
weapons. As the table indicates, the United States and the Soviet Union, including Russia, competed 
throughout the Cold War period to amass a large stockpile of weapons. 
39. The pattern in the numbers of nuclear weapons shown in the table after 1985 is best explained by which of the 
following? 
(A) The spread of communism in Eastern Europe 
(B) Proxy wars in Asia and Africa 
(C) Globalization and the development of international economic unions 
(D) The collapse of the Soviet Union and the end of the Cold War v 
Answer D 
Correct. The collapse of the Soviet Union and the end of the Cold War ended the arms race competition 
between the United States and the Soviet Union, as the latter ceased to exist after 1991. This 
development is reflected in the decrease in nuclear weapons proliferation during the 1990s, as shown in 
the table. 
40. Changes in the overall number of nuclear weapons shown in the table contributed most directly to which of the 
following international developments? 
(A) Revolutionary movements in colonized African countries 
(B) Mass violence caused by ethnic or ideological conflicts 
(C) Institutions investing in economic development in newly independent nations 
(D) International efforts to promote peace and security e 
Answer D 
Correct. During the second half of the twentieth century, there were major international efforts to limit 
the proliferation of nuclear weapons and to decrease nuclear weapons stockpiles in order to increase 
international peace and security. The growth of nuclear stockpiles and the proliferation of nations with 
nuclear weapons contributed to international treaties from the 1960s to 1980s that tried to limit the 
spread of nuclear weapons. 
41. Which of the following is the most serious limitation of the table as a source of information on the comparative 
military capabilities of nuclear powers? 
Page 36 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
(A) It does not include data on the total destructive power of the nuclear stockpiles of each nation. v 
(B) It does not include data on the economic output (gross domestic product) of each nation. 
It does not include data on the number of people in each nation injured or killed by weapons of mass 
© destruction. 
(D) It does not include data on the average life expectancy of the population of each nation. 
Answer A 
Correct. One of the major limitations of the table is the lack of information about the total destructive 
power of the nuclear stockpiles of each nation. The numbers of nuclear weapons alone do not describe 
the destructive capacity of individual weapons or national stockpiles, which varied significantly. 
Information about the total destructive power of the nuclear stockpiles of each nation would allow for 
better context and comparative analysis. 
42, The primary technology shown in the table contributed most directly to advances in which of the following areas? 
(A) Internet and cellular communications 
(B) Energy production v 
(C) Medical vaccines and antibiotics 
(D) Genetically modified agriculture 
Answer B 
Correct. Energy production was another major product of nuclear research and development, making 
significant contributions to basic scientific research as well as to the energy production of many nations. 
AP World History: Modern Page 37 of 64
unit 8 questions 
43. SOUTH ASIA 
Arabian 
Sea 
Bay of 
Bengal 
0 500 Miles 
—r—tr— 
0 500 Kilometers 
The map above shows the territorial arrangements in South Asia that resulted from 
(A) Akbar’s expansion of the Mughal Empire 
(B) rival Arab trading empires 
(C) Dutch and Portuguese colonies 
(D) partition at the time of decolonization v 
(E) treaties with Russia and China 
44. The partition of British India in 1947 created the new Muslim state of Pakistan and the predominantly Hindu state 
of India. The immediate result of the drawing of new geographic boundaries was 
(A) alasting nuclear nonproliferation pact between the newly created states 
(B) religious and ethnic violence that led to mass migrations and massacres v 
(©) a peaceful transition to independence along the lines that Mohandas Gandhi, the nationalist and advocate 
of nonviolence, had envisioned 
(D) the peaceful annexation of Kashmir, a predominantly Muslim state, by Pakistan 
Page 38 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
“[E1 Diario]: Chairman, how does the Peruvian Communist Party sustain the huge party apparatus, including the People’s 
Guerrilla Army? 
[Chairman Gonzalo]: I think this question deserves a detailed explanation. Concerning the party, Chairman Mao teaches 
us—as did Marx, Lenin, and all the great Marxists—that the party is not a mass party, though it has a mass character. It 
has a mass character in the sense that while being a select organization—a selection of the best, of the proven, of those, as 
Stalin said, who have what it takes—being numerically small in proportion to the broad masses, the party defends the 
interests of the proletariat in taking responsibility for its emancipation, which can only come with communism. But since 
other classes that make up the people also participate in the revolution, the party defends their interests as well. 
[£] Diarie]: Chairman, let’s talk about the people’s war now. What does violence mean to you? 
[Chairman Gonzalo]: We see the problem of war this way: war has two aspects, destructive and constructive. Not to see it 
this way undermines the revolution—weakens it. From the moment the people take up arms to overthrow the old order, 
the reaction [state] seeks to crush, destroy, and annihilate the struggle, and it uses all the means at its disposal, including 
genocide. We have seen this in our country. We are seeing it now and will continue to see it until the outmoded Peruvian 
state is demolished.” 
Interview with “Chairman Gonzalo™ [Manuel Rubén Abimael Guzman Reynoso], leader of the Shining Path, a Peruvian revolutionary movement, 
1988. The interview was conducted by the Peruvian newspaper Ef Diario, which was the unofficial newspaper of the Shining Path movement. 
45. The views expressed by Chairman Gonzalo in the passage are best explained in the context of which of the 
following historical circumstances of the late twentieth century? 
(A) The expansion of the military-industrial complex in Latin American states 
(B) The rise of movements that challenged colonial rule in Latin America 
(C) The rise of separatist movements that demanded regional autonomy 
| (D) The intensification of political conflicts between state and nonstate entities v/ 
I Answer D 
Correct. Political conflicts between state and nonstate entities intensified significantly in Latin America 
during the 1970s and 1980s, with the Shining Path representing one of the most prominent examples. 
46. Which of the following explains the most likely purpose of Gonzalo’s answer to the second question in the 
interview? 
(A) To call for the prosecution of those responsible for mass violence in Peru 
(B) To challenge the continued political influence of Western states in Latin America 
(C) To justify the Shining Path’s use of violence to achieve its political objectives v 
(D) To appeal to politicians in Latin American states to adopt reforms to their respective political institutions 
AP World History: Modern Page 39 of 64
unit § questions 
Answer C 
Correct. The most likely purpose of Gonzalo’s answer is to justify the Shining Path’s use of violence to 
achieve its political objectives, by establishing a distinction between what he considered to be 
illegitimate or destructive state violence and the revolutionary violence that he often described as both 
legitimate and constructive. 
47. Which of the following would likely explain Gonzalo’s theoretical discussion of the idea that “the party is not a 
mass party, though it has a mass character” during his answer to the first question? 
His intended audience was indigenous peoples in impoverished areas of Peru who fought for the Shining 
(A)" path movement. 
(B) His intended audience was leftist intellectuals in Latin America and other regions who sympathized with - 
communist ideology. 
) His intended audience was liberal intellectuals in Latin American governments who knew little about the 
( differences between Leninist and Maoist ideologies. 
D His intended audience was criminal organizations in Peru that had agreed to help the Shining Path 
D) movement. 
| Answer B 
Correct. Gonzalo’s complicated and theoretical discussion of the idea that “the party is not a mass party, 
though it has a mass character” indicates that his likely audience would have been lefiist intellectuals in 
Latin America and other regions who understood complex facets of communist ideology. 
Page 40 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
e Scoring Gide 
unit 8 questions 
Image | 
VLADIMIR KANDELAKI, SOVIET ARTIST, HOUSE OF CARDS, PAINTING, 1986 
32019 Artists Rights Society (ARS), New York / GCA, Thilisi 
The image is a parody of the regular military parades staged by the Soviet Communist Party in Red Square, Moscow. 
Image 2 
AP World History: Modern Page 41 of 64
unit 8 questions 
MARAT VALIAKHMETOY, SOVIET ARTIST, “PARADE,” CARTOON PUBLISHED IN A SOVIET 
NEWSPAPER, 1989 
= g 
”!1 it ag 881 [1Eeresenn tmms ‘:é_._h 
[ol====] T Il e 
T Ao 
- 1l 
= o “AAI CO 
B-  &y s si  
'_,_"'_::-'_'__"::'-L— ) Q 
> = 
— 
i e 
A 
The cartoon is a parody of Soviet military parades, with food trucks instead of tanks and military equipment. The trucks 
carry labels saving “BREAD,” “"MILK, " and “MEAT "—all items for which the Soviet Union was experiencing frequent 
consumer shortages. 
48. The depiction of the Soviet Union in the images is best explained as illustrating which of the following 
developments in late-twentieth-century communist states? 
(A) Increasing instances of using force to quell political protests 
(B) Rising ethnic nationalism 
(C) Increasing political instability because of military coups 
(D) Rising public discontent v 
Answer D 
Correct. The images directly illustrate rising discontent in communist states because both images are 
parodies of the military parades frequently conducted in Red Square in Moscow to demonstrate Soviet 
power. In the first image, the Soviet Union is portrayed as a “House of Cards” that could crumble at any 
Page 42 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
moment. In the second image, the military parades are mocked, as food trucks full of staple items that 
were frequently in short supply in the Soviet Union replace the tanks, missile launchers, and other 
military equipment that were typically included in the parades. 
49. The inclusion of the trucks in Image 2 best helps explain which of the following developments in the Soviet Union 
in the late twentieth century? 
The recent collectivization of agriculture weakened the ability of Soviet farmers to compete with 
(A) Western agricultural businesses. 
Although free-market reforms made the Soviet economy more efficient, climate change led to famines 
(B) and crop failures. 
Despite the introduction of free-market reforms under the perestroika program, the Soviet Union’s L 
©) economy continued to deteriorate. 
The increasing role of multinational corporations in the Soviet economy led to protests about growing 
(D) economic inequality. 
Answer C 
Correct. The second image shows economic problems facing the Soviet Union in 1989, as it portrays 
trucks carrying basic food items such as milk, bread, and meat that were often in short supply in the 
Soviet Union during the late twentieth century and for which people often stood in line for hours to 
acquire. The cartoon was created during a time when Mikhail Gorbachev’s perestroika program 
introduced free-market reforms that failed, for a variety of reasons, to prevent the Soviet economy from 
continuing to decline. Economic deterioration in the Soviet Union during the late twentieth century was a 
major reason that the Soviet Union collapsed in 1991. 
50. Which of the following developments in the late twentieth century best explains why the type of power that Soviet 
leaders wished to highlight through the public event shown in Image 1 diminished? 
The Soviet invasion of Afghanistan was an expensive failure that helped prevent the Soviet military o 
(A) from closing growing technological gaps with the United States military. 
(B) Soviet suppression of uprisings in Eastern Europe weakened morale within the Soviet military. 
Soviet conflicts with communist China led to the loss of substantial territories in the east and signaled 
©) the end of Soviet leadership of the communist world. 
(D) The Soviet Union lost tens of thousands of troops during proxy conflicts in Africa and Latin America. 
AP World History: Modern Page 43 of 64
M Scoring Guide 
unit § questions 
Answer A 
Correct. The Soviet war in Afghanistan lasted ten years, was costly, and drained the Soviet treasury. As 
the United States massively increased its defense budget and invested in high-tech military equipment 
such as stealth aircraft, the Soviet Union did not have the economic resources to modernize its military in 
a similar way and compete with the United States. 
Page 44 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
- Scoring Guide 
unit § questions 
Map 1 
British, French, and Portuguese Colonial Possessions in 1930 
B Eritish territories 
and protectorates 
B French territories 
and protectorates 
B Portuguese territories 
and protectorates 
Map 2 
British, French, and Portuguese Colonial Possessions in 1981 
B British territories 
and protectorates 
[ French territories 
and protectorates 
B Portuguese territories 
and protectorates 
5L The changes in political status as depicted on the maps resulted most directly from which of the following? 
AP World History: Modern Page 45 of 64
unit 8 questions 
(A) Migration of imperial subjects to metropoles 
(B) Religious, ethnic, and regional movements challenging imperial rule v/ 
(C) Land and resource redistribution movements advocating communism and socialism 
(D) United Nations mandates ordering imperial states to grant their colonies independence 
Answer B 
Correct. The comparatively few British, French, or Portuguese territories or protectorates in Affica, the 
Middle East, and Asia in 1981 compared with 1930 reflects the results of religious, ethnic, and regional 
movements that challenged imperial rule and gained independence for most nation-states in these three 
regions. 
52. The changes in the political status of the British territories and protectorates in South Asia as shown on the maps led 
most directly to which of the following? 
(A) Proxy wars between former colonial powers 
(B) Large-scale population displacements and transfers v/ 
(C) The settling of territorial disputes by the League of Nations 
(D) The creation of free-trade blocs 
Answer B 
Correct. With the end of British colonial rule in South Asia in 1947, religious and political conflicts led 
to large-scale population displacements and transfers and the establishment of the separate nations of 
India and Pakistan. 
53. Which of the following most directly opposed the creation of the postcolonial political borders shown on Map 2 7 
(A) Transnational movements, such as Pan-Africanism v/ 
(B) Regional trading blocs, such as the European Economic Community 
(C) Military alliances, such as NATO 
(D) Global international organizations, such as the United Nations 
Page 46 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
Answer A 
Correct. Transnational movements, such as Pan-Africanism or the Pan-Arab movement, imagined a 
postcolonial landscape where national borders, which frequently reflected the arbitrary decisions of 
European colonial authorities, might be redrawn and new transnational identities could be emphasized. 
In your response, you will be assessed on the following. 
Respond to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis or claim that establishes a line of reasoning. 
Describe a broader historical context relevant to the prompt. 
Support an argument in response to the prompt using at least four documents. 
Use at least one additional piece of specific historical evidence (beyond that found in the documents) relevant to 
an argument about the prompt. 
= For at least two documents, explain how or why the document’s point of view, purpose, historical situation, and/ 
or audience is relevant to an argument. 
+ Demonstrate a complex understanding of a historical development related to the prompt through sophisticated 
argumentation and/or effective use of evidence. 
Document 1 
Source: United States Congress House of Representatives, Committee on Un-American Activities, How Communists 
Menace Vital Materials, map published in 1956. 
A legend below the map provides assessments by the Commiitee of Un-American Activities regarding Soviet activities in 
various paris of the world. 
The assessment for Africa (arrow number three) reads: 
“Africa: [Soviet] encouragement of nationalist terrorists. Stirring up racial tensions. Psychological warfare against U.S. 
and West based on colonialism and color.” 
AP World History: Modern Page 47 of 64
. 5 8@ 
unit 8 questions 
Document 2 
Source: Editorial in Evening News, the official newspaper of the ruling Ghanaian Convention People’s Party, published on 
the eve of the first Conference of Independent African States, Accra, Ghana, 1958. 
“When it is an African uprising against tyranny and oppression, the imperialists call it "terrorism’; but when it is White 
people taking up arms under similar conditions they call it a just cause. [For example], the recent Hungarian uprising® was 
universally praised as a just opposition against suppression, and the Hungarians who participated in it were christened 
“freedom fighters.” But what the Russians did to the Hungarians that the “free” world made so much fuss about was the 
same thing that the British did in Kenya, and the French are doing in Algeria. . . . 
It is high time that we be blunt and impartial in our condemnation of imperialism, regardless of which power is carrying it 
out. . . . We have no love for Russia and are not interested in the dirty business of Eastern-Western power bloc politics. 
But so many in the west are ready to accuse Russia of her brutalities, yet defend [ Western] imperialism because, they 
claim, it is saving Africa from the “terrorism™ of self-rule!” 
*A reference to the Hungarian Revolution of 1956, in which mass protests toppled the country’s communist government, 
leading a Soviet-led military invasion and the forcible reimposition of communist rule. 
Document 3 
Source: United States Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) Director Allen Dulles, secret diplomatic telegram to the CIA 
agent in the Congolese capital Leopoldville, August 26, 1960. 
“In your dispatch of August 18, you expressed the opinion that the Congo is experiencing a classic communist takeover* 
whether or not Lumumba himself is a Communist or just playing the Communist game to help him solidify his power. 
You state that there might be little time left in which to take action if we were to avoid another Cuba. 
In high quarters here [in Washington], there is the clear-cut conclusion that as long as Lumumba continues to hold high 
office, the inevitable result will at best be chaos and at worst it would pave the way to Communist takeover of the Congo, 
with disastrous consequences for the U.S. and for the interests of the free world. Consequently, we conclude that 
[Lumumba’s] removal must be an urgent and prime objective that should be a high priority of our covert action in the 
Congo.” 
*a reference to the May 1960 Congolese election which brought to power Patrice Lumumba, independent Congo’s first 
prime minister. 
Document 4 
Source: Frantz Fanon, French West Indian political philosopher and activist, Toward the African Revolution, book 
published in 1964. 
“It is surely not by chance that the hand of Moscow is “discovered,” in an almost stereotyped way, behind each demand 
for national independence put forth by a colonial people. This is because any difficulty that is put in the way of the 
supremacy of the West is seen as a threat to its economic power and its military interests .. . . . 
The position taken by a few newly independent countries, which are determined to remain outside the policy of the 
superpower blocs, has introduced a new dimension into the balance of forces in the world. Adopting the so-called policy 
of positive neutralism, of non-dependence, of non-commitment, the underdeveloped countries that are awakening from a 
long slumber of slavery and of oppression are trying to remain outside of any warlike involvement, in order to devote 
themselves to the urgent economic tasks, to staving off hunger, to the improvement of man’s lot.” 
Page 48 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
Document 5 
Source: Viktor Bakin, Soviet diplomatic official in Poland, briefing to Polish officials on Soviet activities in Somalia, 
1971. 
“After the 1969 military coup in Somalia and the assumption of power of General Siad Barre’s Revolutionary Council, 
many positive elements in Somali domestic and foreign policies can be observed. Therefore, the Soviet Union is planning 
to comprehensively activate its relations with that country, including the following activities undertaken so far. . . 
In the economic field: The Soviet Union offered Somalia a long-term loan of 40 million rubles. . . The sending of 
additional Soviet specialists to Somalia was also agreed. Currently there are 111 Soviet specialists, outside the military 
field, in Somalia, including five professionals working in various Somali government departments. Thirty-two Soviet 
teachers and 18 Soviet doctors are planned to travel to Somalia this year. There are 350 Somalis, except those at military 
academies, currently studying in the Soviet Union. 
In the military field: The Soviet Union also provides military assistance to Somalia. The Somali army, numbering 14,000 
troops, is almost exclusively equipped with Soviet weaponry and is trained by Soviet military specialists. Somali statf 
officers are trained in the Soviet Union. 
We seek to further promote relations with Somalia, and we hope that the other socialist countries, including Poland, will 
also develop their economic and political ties with that country. It would be desirable, therefore, to coordinate USSR’s 
and the other socialist countries’ activities in that regard.” 
Document 6 
Source: Janez Hocevar, Yugoslav ambassador to Somalia, report to the Yugoslav government, sent from Mogadishu, 
Somalia, 1975. 
“Although many questions remain open as to the reason behind President Siad’s recent invitation to the Americans to 
inspect the Soviet-built military facilities in the [Somali] port of Berbera,* 1 believe it was aimed at demonstrating to the 
world that Soviet-friendly Somalia can retain control over all of its military installations. This affirms the Somali policy of 
independence and nonalignment. President Siad might also intend to lessen Somali diplomatic isolation in order to engage 
with the Arab League, the Organization of African Unity, and other nonaligned countries. 
The Soviet Union took advantage of the locals, building military complexes according to Soviet needs. This is taking a 
toll on Somalia’s path toward true independence. The American inspections, although humiliating, are improving Somali- 
American relations. They hint at a possible future where the United States provides economic and humanitarian assistance 
in order to match Soviet influence. This would expand the Somali leadership’s room for maneuvering.” 
*In the mid-1970s, the relationship between Siad Barre’s government and the Soviet Union began to deteriorate because 
of Soviet unwillingness to back Somali claims over parts of neighboring Ethiopia. 
Document 7 
Source: Robert Mugabe, leader of the Zimbabwe African National Union [ZANU], a political and military organization 
trying to end White minority rule in Rhodesia/Zimbabwe, interview in the Mozambique-based newspaper Tempo, 1978. 
“We are not a creation of the Soviet Union or Cuba; we are a creation of Zimbabwe. Our army is a manifestation of the 
nationalist desires of our people, a product of the history of our country. . . . It is true that the Soviets gave us aid, as did 
the entire international socialist community. ZAPU# trained militants in Cuba and, after 1967, and so did we. But though 
we trained cadres in the socialist countries, this did not transform our army into a Russian or Chinese army. Our war is 
supported by the progressive world. And it is true that our objective is the liquidation of imperialism and colonialism. But 
it is the Zimbabwean people who are fighting the war. No one can deny us the right to seek aid from our friends and allies. 
AP World History: Modern Page 49 of 64
unit 8 questions 
But it will always be Zimbabweans who direct the struggle.” 
*Another Zimbabwean militant group fighting against minority White rule in Rhodesia/Zimbabwe 
54. Evaluate the extent to which African countries were able to conduct independent policies during the Cold War 
period. 
PART A: THESIS/CLAIM 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the thesis must make a claim that responds to the prompt rather than restating or rephrasing the prompt. 
The thesis must consist of one or more sentences located in one place, either in the introduction or the conclusion. 
v 
The response responds to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis/claim that establishes a line of reasoning about 
the extent to which African countries were able to conduct independent policies during the Cold War period. 
Examples that earn this point include: 
-"Due to the competition between the Soviet Union and the United States during the Cold War, many African countries 
were able to play the two superpowers against each other in order to pursue policies that were in their own national 
interests.” (includes a claim and introduces a line of reasoning evaluating the extent to which African countries were able 
to conduct independent policies during the Cold War period) 
-*“During the Cold War, newly independent nations in Africa found it difficult to avoid being drawn into proxy conflicts 
between the United States and the USSR. Nonetheless, many African countries managed to conduct independent policies 
by various means, including joining the Non-Aligned Movement, leveraging their strategic location or natural resources 
or, in some cases, playing off the superpowers against each other.” (includes a claim and introduces a line of reasoning 
evaluating the extent to which African countries were able to conduct independent policies during the Cold War period) 
-“Some African states were unable to have independent policies because of US or Soviet interference.” (includes a 
minimally acceptable claim and a line of reasoning evaluating the extent to which African countries were able to conduct 
independent policies during the Cold War period) 
PART B: CONTEXTUALIZATION 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must describe broader historical events, developments, or processes that occur before, 
during, or continue after the time frame of the question that are relevant to the topic of the prompt. To earn this point, the 
context provided must be more than a phrase or a reference. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
Page 50 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
The response describes a broader historical context relevant to Cold War superpower rivalries in Affrica, decolonization, 
effect of inherited colonial borders on African countries’ political stability, challenges of African economic development 
post-independence, etc. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. Examples of context might include the following, with appropriate elaboration: 
- The legacy of European imperialism in Africa. 
- The circumstances in which African countries gained independence after the Second World War 
- Socialist and/or Communist ideology and its effects on African independence movements 
- United States foreign policy shifting from isolationism in the 1930s to greater interventionism in the 1950s and 1960s as 
part of the “Domino Theory™ 
PART C1: EVIDENCE - USES THE CONTENT OF THE DOCUMENTS 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must accurately describe — rather than simply quote — the content from at least three of 
the documents. 
\/ 
The response uses the content of at least three documents to address the topic of the prompt. Must accurately 
describe—rather than simply quote—the content from at least three documents. 
Documents used: 
Document 1: United States Committee on Un-American Activities’ Communist influence map 
Document 2: Ghanaian newspaper’s editorial on Western characterization of African anticolonial 
movements 
Document 3: Dulles’s telegram to the CIA agent in the Congo 
Document 4: Fanon'’s, advice to African states from Toward the African Revolution 
Document 5: Bakin’s briefing to Polish officials on Soviet assistance to Somalia 
Document 6: Hocevar’s report to the Yugoslav government on Somalia accepting United States military 
inspections 
Document 7: Mugabe’s interview with a Mozambique-based newspaper on Zimbabweans and foreign 
AP World History: Modern Page 51 of 64
unit 8 questions 
assistance 
PART C2: EVIDENCE - SUPPORTS AN ARGUMENT USING DOCUMENTS 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must accurately describe—rather than simply quote—the content from at least four 
documents. In addition, the response must use the content of the documents to support an argument in response to the 
prompt. 
v 
The response supports an argument in response to the prompt using at least four documents. 
Documents used: 
Document 1: United States Committee on Un-American Activities’ Communist influence map 
Document 2: Ghanaian newspaper’s editorial on Western characterization of African anticolonial 
movements 
Document 3: Dulles’s telegram to the CIA agent in the Congo 
Document 4: Fanon’s, advice to African states from Toward the African Revolution 
Document 5: Bakin’s briefing to Polish officials on Soviet assistance to Somalia 
Document 6: Hocevar’s report to the Yugoslav government on Somalia accepting United States military 
inspections 
Document 7: Mugabe’s interview with a Mozambique-based newspaper on Zimbabweans and foreign 
assistance 
Examples of evidence used to support an argument: 
-(Document 3): “The CIA telegram to its agent in Congo provides direct instructions that a democratically elected 
African leader needs to be removed because he “is a Communist or just playing the Communist game.” This shows that 
when an African state tried to have policies that the US strongly disapproved of, the US was willing to take extreme 
measure to prevent them from doing so.” 
-(Document 6): “The Yugoslav ambassador to Somalia observed how the Somali government opened up to contacts with 
the United States, even though it had also received significant Soviet military and economic aid. The Somali government 
was clearly trying to gain aid from both the United States and the USSR, which shows how African countries could 
balance the superpowers against each other and pursue their own independent policies.” 
PART C3: EVIDENCE - EVIDENCE BEYOND THE DOCUMENTS 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must describe the evidence and must use more than a phrase or reference. This additional 
piece of evidence must be different from the evidence used to earn the point for contextualization. The point for evidence 
beyond the documents may be awarded for evidence that appears in any part of the response. 
Page 52 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v’ 
The response uses at least one additional piece of the specific historical evidence (beyond that found in the documents) 
relevant to an argument about the prompt. 
- This additional piece of evidence must be different from the evidence used to earn the point for contextualization. 
Typically, statements credited as contextualization will be more general statements that place an argument or a 
significant portion of it in a broader context. 
- Statements credited as supporting evidence beyond the documents will typically be more specific details that function 
as support for a particular point made in an argument, analogous to the function of evidence drawn from the documents. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. Evidence beyond the documents might include the following, with appropriate 
elaboration: 
- Specific African countries (other than those mentioned in the documents) allying themselves with the Communist Bloc — 
Egypt during Nasser’s presidency, Angola, Mozambique, Libya, Ethiopia 
- Specific African countries (other than those mentioned in the documents) allying themselves with the West — Zaire 
during Mobutu’s presidency, Kenya, South Aftrica 
« African conflicts that became Cold War proxy conflicts (other than those mentioned in the documents) — Angola civil 
War, Algerian War of Independence, Ogaden (Ethiopian-Somali) War, Biafra war, Chad-Libya war, Suez Crisis, etc. 
- African countries and/or leaders active in the Non-Aligned movement — Egypt (Nasser), Ghana (Nkrumah), Tanzania 
(Nyerere), ete. 
- Post-independence movements for economic and political integration of African countries — Pan-Africanism, East 
African Community, etc. 
PART D1: ANALYSIS AND REASONING - SOURCING 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must explain how or why (rather than simply identifying) the document’s point of view, 
purpose, historical situation, or audience is relevant to an argument about the prompt for each of the two documents 
sourced. 
v 
The response explains how or why the documents’ point of view, purpose, historical situation, and/or audience is relevant 
to an argument about the prompt for at least two of the documents. 
AP World History: Modern Page 53 of 64
unit 8 questions 
Document 1: United States Committee on Un-American Activities’ Communist influence map 
Document 2: Ghanaian newspaper’s editorial on Western characterization of African anticolonial 
movements 
Document 3: Dulles’s telegram to the CIA agent in the Congo 
Document 4: Fanon’s, advice to African states from Toward the African Revolution 
Document 5: Bakin’s briefing to Polish officials on Soviet assistance to Somalia 
Document 6: Hocevar’s report to the Yugoslav government on Somalia accepting United States military 
inspections 
Document 7: Mugabe’s interview with a Mozambique-based newspaper on Zimbabweans and foreign 
assistance 
Examples of sourcing a document: 
-(Document 3): “As the director of the CIA, Allen Dulles must have had access to the highest levels of US foreign policy 
making and strategy. His support for the CIA trying to overturn the Lumumba government in the Congo clearly shows 
that the US was determined to all it could to stop the spread of communism in Africa.” 
-(Document 7): “Because this is an interview with a newspaper from a friendly African country (Mozambique), Mugabe 
emphasizes that ZANU is a homegrown African independence movement and downplays the importance of the support 
his group has received from the Soviet Union, China, or Cuba.” 
-(Document 6): “The report by the Yugoslav ambassador to Somalia is probably a reliable account of the situation in that 
country, not only because diplomats are usually expected to report faithfully to their governments but also because 
Yugoslavia itself was not a member of either the communist or the capitalist bloc. As such, a Yugoslav diplomat would 
probably not have been under pressure to present the situation in Somalia through an ideological perspective.” 
PART D2: ANALYSIS AND REASONING - COMPLEXITY 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must demonstrate a complex understanding. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through sophisticated argumentation that is relevant to the prompt. 
This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Explaining multiple themes or perspectives to explore complexity or nuance; OR 
- Explaining multiple causes or effects, multiple similarities or differences, or multiple continuities or changes; OR 
- Explaining both cause and effect, both similarity and difference, or both continuity and change; OR 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections within and across periods or geographical areas. These connections 
should clearly relate to an argument that responds to the prompt. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through effective use of evidence relevant to an argument that 
addresses the prompt. This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Effectively using seven documents to support an argument that responds to the prompt; OR 
- Explaining how the point of view, purpose, historical situation, and/or audience of at least four documents supports an 
argument that responds to the prompt; OR 
Page 54 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
- Using documents and evidence beyond the documents effectively to demonstrate a sophisticated understanding of 
different perspectives relevant to the prompt. 
This understanding must be part of the argument, not merely a phrase or reference. 
While it is not necessary for this complex understanding to be woven throughout the response, it must be more than 
merely a phrase or reference. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response demonstrates a complex understanding of the historical development that is the focus of the prompt, through 
sophisticated argumentation and/or effective use of evidence. 
Examples of demonstrating a complex understanding might include: 
- Explaining the nuance of an issue by analyzing multiple variables, such as exploring different aspects of the relationship 
African countries and the Cold War superpowers or blocs 
- Analyzing multiple variables by constructing an argument that explores the complexity of the international situation 
during the Cold War period and relating that complexity to African countries’ ability to pursue independent policies. 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections across time and space, such as constructing an argument that explains 
how the situation of African countries in the context of the Cold War had similarities or differences to the situation of 
nineteenth-century African countries or leaders (for example, independent Ethiopia or Muhammad Ali’s Egypt) in the 
context of nineteenth-century imperialism and/or Great Power international politics. 
- Confirming the validity of an argument by corroborating multiple perspectives, such as by explaining how, despite the 
different political views and priorities expressed in the documents, several of them agree that African states could conduct 
independent policies by strategically making on breaking alliances with one superpower bloc or the other. 
- Qualifying or modifying an argument by considering diverse or alternative views or evidence, such as by discussing how 
the ideological perspectives of several documents create imitations in answering the question posed in the prompt. 
In your response, you will be assessed on the following. 
« Respond to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis or claim that establishes a line of reasoning. 
= Describe a broader historical context relevant to the prompt. 
« Support an argument in response to the prompt using at least two pieces of specific and relevant evidence. 
= Use historical reasoning (e.g., comparison, causation, continuity or change) to frame or structure an argument 
that addresses the prompt. 
» Demonstrate a complex understanding of a historical development related to the prompt through sophisticated 
argumentation and/or effective use of evidence. 
AP World History: Modern Page 55 of 64
unit 8 questions 
55.  Inthe twentieth century, conflicts such as the two world wars and the Cold War occurred on a global scale. 
Develop an argument that evaluates the extent to which global conflicts led to cultural or social changes during 
this period. 
PART A: THESIS/CLAIM 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the thesis must make a claim that responds to the prompt, rather than merely restating or rephrasing the 
prompt. The thesis must consist of one or more sentences located in one place, either in the introduction or the conclusion. 
v 
The response responds to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis/claim that establishes a line of reasoning about 
the extent to which twentieth century global conflicts led to cultural or social changes. 
Scoring Note: The thesis does not have to mention multiple states or conflicts. 
Examples that earn this point include the following: 
-“Global conflicts led to only minimal degrees of social and cultural change in the twentieth century because men 
remained politically, and economically dominant and Western culture became increasingly dominant globally.” 
-“The global conflicts of the twentieth century created the conditions for social change through total war, which 
transformed the way many societies viewed things like women working for a living, governments providing welfare 
benefits, or Europeans controlling the lives of non-European people through imperialism.™ 
-“Although there were major global contlicts in the twentieth century, they were not the primary cause of social and 
cultural change, which instead was more the result of long-term demographic and technological developments.™ 
-“The First World War led to huge social change because it led to the communist Revolution in Russia.” 
PART B: CONTEXTUALIZATION 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must describe broader historical events, developments, or processes that occur before, 
during, or continue after the time frame of the question that are relevant to the topic of the prompt. To earn this point, the 
context provided must be more than a phrase or a reference. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
Page 56 of 64 AP World History: Moderm 
unit 8 questions 
The response describes a broader historical context relevant to global contlicts or social or cultural change in the twentieth 
century. 
Examples of context might include the following, provided the essay clearly connects them to the prompi: 
- The growth of Marxist ideology 
- The expansion of European empires 
- The women’s rights and suffrage movements 
- Consumerism and capitalism 
- The Industrial Revolution 
- The growth of new media 
- The persistence of religious and other cultural beliefs 
- European empires’ mobilization of their colonies during global conflicts 
PART C1: EVIDENCE - PROVIDES EVIDENCE 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn one point, the response must identify at least two specific pieces of evidence relevant to the topic of the prompt. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response provides at least two specific historical examples of evidence relevant to the topic of the prompt. 
Examples of evidence used might include the following: 
- The mobilization of women as factory workers 
- Expansion of welfare measures as a result of wartime mobilization 
- Anti-war protest movements 
- The Holocaust 
- Decolonization 
- The Bolshevik Revolution 
-Mao Zedong 
AP World History: Modern Page 57 of 64
unit 8 questions 
- Nuclear arms race 
- Proxy wars in Asia and Africa 
PART C2: EVIDENCE - USES EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT AN ARGUMENT 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must use at least two pieces of specific and relevant evidence to support an argument in 
response to the prompt. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response supports an argument in response to the prompt using at least two pieces of specific and relevant evidence. 
An example of evidence used to support an argument: 
-“The devastation of the First and Second World wars introduced social change by encouraging governments to become 
more heavily involved in shaping national economies and societies. For example, after the Second World War, the British 
and French governments created national health services to provide free health care to all of their citizens while many 
other states adopted tax policies that transferred wealth from the highest income groups to the lower classes.” 
-“Technological development was more important than the World Wars in spreading cultural change around the world. 
For instance, the development of television was far more important in spreading American culture across the world than 
the outcome of the Second World War.” 
Examples of evidence used might include the following, provided the essay uses the examples in support of an argument 
about the prompt: 
- The mobilization of women as factory workers 
- The Holocaust 
- Decolonization 
- The Bolshevik Revolution 
-Mao Zedong 
- Nuclear arms race 
- Proxy wars in Asia and Africa 
PART D1: USES HISTORICAL REASONING 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
Page 58 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
To earn the point, the response must demonstrate the use of historical reasoning to frame or structure an argument, 
although the reasoning might be uneven or imbalanced, or the evidence may be overly general or lacking specificity. 
v’ 
The response uses historical reasoning (e.g. comparison, causation, continuity and change) to frame or structure an 
argument that addresses the prompt 
Examples of using historical reasoning to frame or structure an argument might include the following, with appropriate 
elaboration: 
- Explaining how, as European states broke under the strain of the First World War; communists such as Lenin found an 
opportunity to advance their ideology. 
- Explaining how, during the Cold War, each side pushed its ideological perspective on newly independent states, leading 
to proxy wars and civil conflicts, as well as the Non-Aligned movement. 
- Explaining how, because of the World Wars and the genocides that were committed during them, racial ideology was 
challenged. 
PART D2: ANALYSIS AND REASONING - COMPLEXITY 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through sophisticated argumentation that is relevant to the prompt. 
This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Explaining multiple themes or perspectives to explore complexity or nuance; OR 
- Explaining multiple causes or effects, multiple similarities or differences, or multiple continuities or changes; OR 
- Explaining both cause and effect, both similarity and difference, or both continuity and change; OR 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections within and across periods or geographical areas. These connections 
should clearly relate to an argument that responds to the prompt. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through effective use of evidence relevant to an argument that 
addresses the prompt. This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Explaining how multiple pieces of evidence (at least four) support a nuanced or complex argument that responds to the 
prompt; OR 
- Using evidence effectively to demonstrate a sophisticated understanding of different perspectives relevant to the prompt. 
This demonstration of a complex understanding must be part of the argument and may be demonstrated in any part of the 
response. 
While it is not necessary for this complex understanding to be woven throughout the response, it must be more than 
merely a phrase or reference. 
AP World History: Modern Page 59 of 64
unit 8 questions 
The response demonstrates a complex understanding of the historical development that is the focus of the prompt, through 
sophisticated argumentation and/or effective use of evidence. 
Demonstrating a complex understanding might include the following, with appropriate elaboration: 
- Explaining the nuance of an issue by analyzing multiple variables, such as the different effects of global 
conflicts in different parts of the world on social or cultural change 
- Explaining both continuity and change, such as social or cultural continuities and changes in society 
after the World Wars 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections within and across periods by linking the global conflicts 
of the twentieth century with earlier conflicts such as the Seven Years” War or the wars of the French 
Revolution and Napoleon 
-Confirming the validity of an argument by corroborating multiple perspectives, such as considering the 
differing effects Marxist thought had on social structures in different parts of the world 
-Qualifying or modifying an argument by considering diverse or alternative views or evidence, such as 
arguing that there were varying degrees of change across the world based on local conditions and the 
direct effects of the global conflicts on different areas 
56. Inyour response, you will be assessed on the following. 
+ Respond to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis or claim that establishes a line of reasonin 
+ Describe a broader historical context relevant to the prompt. 
+ Support an argument in response to the prompt using at least two pieces of specific and relevant 
evidence. 
+ Use historical reasoning (e.g., comparison, causation, continuity or change over time) to frame or 
structure an argument that addresses the prompt. 
« Demonstrate a complex understanding of a historical development related to the prompt through 
sophisticated argumentation and/or effective use of evidence. 
In the period after 1900, the role of the state in the economy varied, with many states adopting policies to control 
or manage their economies. 
Develop an argument that evaluates the extent to which one or more states controlled their economies in this time 
period. 
PART A: THESIS/CLAIM 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the thesis must make a claim that responds to the prompt, rather than merely restating or rephrasing the 
prompt. The thesis must consist of one or more sentences located in one place, either in the introduction or the conclusion. 
Page 60 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
& 
unit 8 questions 
The response responds to the prompt with a historically defensible thesis/claim that establishes a line of reasoning about 
the extent to which one or more states controlled their economies in the period after 1900. 
Scoring Note: The thesis is not required to encompass the entire period, but must identify a relevant development or 
developments in the period. 
Examples that earn this point include: 
-“The twentieth century included several examples of states controlling their economies, the most famous being that of 
the Soviet Union, which used Marxist ideology to justify its nationalization of industry and introduction of centralized 
economic planning.” 
-“While some states after 1900, such as communist Russia and China, exercised great control over their economies, the 
United States and many Western European coutries believed in implementing more free-market policies.” 
-“In recent years, many countries rejected the idea of trying to control their economies and embraced free-market 
capitalism.” 
PART B: CONTEXTUALIZATION 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must describe broader historical events, developments, or processes that occur before, 
during, or continue after the time frame of the question that are relevant to the topic of the prompt. To earn this point, the 
context provided must be more than a phrase or a reference. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response describes a broader historical context relevant to the development of states and economic policy in the 
period after 1900. 
Examples of acceptable contextualization: 
-“World War I upset the global political and economic order and led to the establishment of new totalitarian states.” 
PART C1: EVIDENCE - PROVIDES EVIDENCE 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
AP World History: Modern Page 61 of 64
unit 8 questions 
To earn this point, the response must identify at least two specific historical examples relevant to the topic of the prompt. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response provides specific examples of evidence relevant to the topic of the prompt 
Examples of acceptable evidence used might include the following: 
-“Mao Zedong’s Great Leap Forward is one of the best examples of communist states controlling their economies.” 
PART C2: EVIDENCE - USES EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT AN ARGUMENT 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must use at least two specific historical examples to support an argument in response to 
the prompt. 
The course framework often allows teachers the flexibility to select their own examples when teaching the course content. 
As a result, responses may vary. 
v 
The response supports an argument in response to the prompt using at least two pieces of specific and relevant 
evidence. 
An example of evidence used to support an argument: 
-“In early-twentieth-century Japan, the state attempted to control the economy indirectly, by supporting and partnering 
with large private companies called zaibarsu, which were given favorable tax rates and tariff protection in exchange for 
developing heavy industry, which the state needed for its military expansion. In Nazi Germany too, the government used 
indirect measures to control and direct the economy, the Nazis established close ties with leading German manufacturers 
and banks many of whom had lucrative government military contracts. In exchange for their cooperation, these companies 
and banks were given a free hand to deal with labor unions workers’ demands.” 
Examples of evidence used might include the following: 
- Communist states such as the Soviet Union and China exercised great control over their economies by collectivizing 
agriculture and Five-Year Plans. 
- Fascist states (including Japan) in the interwar period developed corporatist economic policies where state officials and 
representatives of big business cooperated in guiding economic policy and setting production targets in some economic 
sectors, while preserving the basic structure of a capitalist economy. 
Page 62 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
unit 8 questions 
- Partly in response to the two world wars and the Great Depression, many Western states also increased their level of 
intervention in the economy, by more actively promoting economic development projects, adopting some level of 
economic planning, and launching social welfare programs 
- Beginning in the 1980s, the growing emphasis on neoliberal, free market economic policies led some countries, notably 
the United States and Great Britain to return to less interventionist economic policies. 
- After decolonization, many newly independent states in Asia, Africa, and the Americas pursued interventionist 
(sometimes socialist) economic policies and attempted to guide their countries' economic development. 
- Especially in the last decades of the twentieth century, international economic organizations such as the IMF and World 
Bank restricted some governments' ability to control their economies by imposing Western economic practices. 
PART DI1: USES HISTORICAL REASONING 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must demonstrate the use of historical reasoning to frame or structure an argument, 
although the reasoning might be uneven or imbalanced, or the evidence may be overly general or lacking specificity. . 
v 
The response uses historical reasoning (e.g. comparison, causation, continuity and change) to frame or structure an 
argument that addresses the prompt 
Examples of using historical reasoning to frame or structure an argument might include the following, with appropriate 
elaboration: 
- Explaining the role of ideologies and economic theories, such as Marxism, neoliberalism, or Keynesian economics in 
informing states' economic policies in the twentieth century 
- Explaining the role of new technologies such as mass media or the Internet on states' ability to control or direct their 
economies 
- Explaining the role of economic cycles in increasing or lowering the appeal of ideas and policies of government 
economic regulations 
- Explaining the role of wars and wartime resource mobilization on governments' ability and/or willingness to regulate the 
national economy 
PART D2: ANALYSIS AND REASONING - COMPLEXITY 
Select a point value to view scoring criteria and/or examples, and to score the response. 
To earn this point, the response must demonstrate a complex understanding. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through sophisticated argumentation that is relevant to the prompt. 
This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Explaining multiple themes or perspectives to explore complexity or nuance; OR 
AP World History: Modern Page 63 of 64
unit 8 questions 
- Explaining multiple causes or effects, multiple similarities or differences, or multiple continuities or changes; OR 
- Explaining both cause and effect, both similarity and difference, or both continuity and change; OR 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections within and across periods or geographical areas. These connections 
should clearly relate to an argument that responds to the prompt. 
A response may demonstrate a complex understanding through effective use of evidence relevant to an argument that 
addresses the prompt. This may be done in a variety of ways, such as: 
- Explaining how multiple pieces of evidence (at least four) support a nuanced or complex argument that responds to the 
prompt; OR 
- Using evidence effectively to demonstrate a sophisticated understanding of different perspectives relevant to the prompt. 
This demonstration of a complex understanding must be part of the argument and may be demonstrated in any part of the 
response. 
While it is not necessary for this complex understanding to be woven throughout the response, it must be more than 
merely a phrase or reference. 
v 
The response demonstrates a complex understanding of the historical development that is the focus of the prompt, using 
evidence to corroborate, qualify, or modify an argument that addresses the question 
Examples of demonstrating a complex understanding might include: 
- Explaining the nuance of an issue by analyzing multiple variables or by considering diverse or alternative perspectives 
or evidence, such as constructing an argument that discusses how economic globalization and the increasingly 
international nature of economic production and consumption is diminishing the importance of the nation state as an 
economic actor 
- Qualifying or modifying the main argument of the essay to demonstrate awareness of historical complexity, such as 
constructing an argument that even states that attempted to control their economies completely sometimes relaxed their 
control and allowed some measure of private economic initiative (as seen in the examples of the NEP and perestroika 
policies in the Soviet Union or in China following the liberalization policies of Deng Xiaoping). Alternatively, even states 
that subscribe to free market economic principles sometimes adopt aspects of economic control (as seen in the examples 
of various wartime planning boards and the nationalization of many pension and medical insurance schemes in Western 
countries) 
- Explaining relevant and insightful connections across time and space, such as explaining why the economic policies of 
the nineteenth centuries became discredited in the early twentieth century and then partly returned to favor in the late 
twentieth century 
Page 64 of 64 AP World History: Moderm
World History - POLITICAL VOCABULARY 
1) Abdicate 23)  Heresy 
2) Accession 24)  Imperialism 
3) Antipathy 25)  Loquacious 
4) Arbitrary 26)  Magnates 
5) Assert 27)  Manipulate 
6) Autocracy 28)  Manumission 
7) Autonomy 29)  Mercenary 
8) Benign 30)  Militia 
9) Bureaucracy 31)  Misnomer 
10)  Capricious 32)  Monarchy 
11)  Castigate 33)  Nationalism 
12)  Circumstantial 34)  Oligarchy 
13)  Conciliation 35)  Pejorative 
14) Consolidation 36) Persecution 
15)  Coup (coup d'etat) 37)  Precedent 
16)  Depose 38)  Prerogative 
17)  Despotism 39)  Propaganda 
18)  Diplomacy 40)  Quintessential 
19)  Expedient 41)  Rationalization 
20)  Extortion 42)  Reticent 
21)  Fealty 43)  Rubric 
22)  Fraternize 44)  Secular
45) Spiritual 
46) Status quo ante bellum 
47) Symbiotic 
48) Tenacious 
49) Tenuous 
50) Usurp
HIPP HELP 
The Source Analysis Toolbox 
All documents, no matter who wrote them, contain some form of personal bias. It is impossible to 
truly write objectively. Because EVERYTHING has bias, it is never adequate to simply say “Doc 1 is biased” 
instead, you must identify and explain the bias using one or more of the tools described in the acronym 
HIPP. Remember: Start with the source line! 
Tool Questions to Consider Helpful tips 
When and where was the source produced? Useful with maps and 
What contemporaneous events might have affected the charts 
H istorical author’s viewpoint and/or message? 
Situation e How does the context affect the reliability of the source? 
¢ Who was the source created for? Use an adjective in 
« How might the audience have affected the content of the | front of the audience 
Intended source? and then explain the 
Audience « Who was the secondary audience? significance of that 
adjective. 
Why did the author create the source? The purpose you 
What is in it for the author? analyze in HIPP must 
What does she/he have to gain or lose? not be what is 
(fame/money/political power/prestige) obvious in the 
What type of ACTION or goal did the author want document. Avoid 
performed or achieved? using “to 
Purposa Is there a significant time difference between the source inform/educatefteach” 
and the event the source is discussing? as the purpose, it is 
likely too vague. 
Purpose and 
audience can often 
be combined. 
What characteristic of the author could have shaped the Characteristics 
author's message? include: Class, 
Is there a clear tone? Sarcastic, authoritarian, Occupation, Religion, 
Point of exaggerating? Why? Nationality, Political 
View Are there glaring omissions? position, 
Ethnicity/race, 
Gender 
Additional tips: You must analyze the source of THREE docs, but you should try for 4-5. Avoid absolute 
terms, instead speculate about the source saying “may have” or “could have”. Some documents work better 
with different parts of HIPP, you use them just like tools in a toolbox. If you need the same one every time, 
that's fine. If you need to use more than one tool to get the job done, that's fine too. 
HIPP HELP 
The Source Analysis Toolbox 
All documents, no matter who wrote them, contain some form of personal bias. It is impossible to 
truly write objectively. Because EVERYTHING has bias, it is never adequate to simply say “Doc 1 is biased” 
instead, you must identify and explain the bias using one or more of the tools described in the acronym 
HIPP. Remember: Start with the source line! 
Tool Questions to Consider Helpful tips 
When and where was the source produced? Useful with maps and 
What contemporaneous events might have affected the charts 
H istorical author’s viewpoint and/or message? 
Situation e How does the context affect the reliability of the source? 
¢ Who was the source created for? Use an adjective in 
« How might the audience have affected the content of the | front of the audience 
Intended source? and then explain the 
Audience « Who was the secondary audience? significance of that 
adjective. 
Why did the author create the source? The purpose you 
What is in it for the author? analyze in HIPP must 
What does she/he have to gain or lose? not be what is 
(fame/money/political power/prestige) obvious in the 
What type of ACTION or goal did the author want document. Avoid 
performed or achieved? using “to 
Purposa Is there a significant time difference between the source inform/educatefteach” 
and the event the source is discussing? as the purpose, it is 
likely too vague. 
Purpose and 
audience can often 
be combined. 
What characteristic of the author could have shaped the Characteristics 
author's message? include: Class, 
Is there a clear tone? Sarcastic, authoritarian, Occupation, Religion, 
Point of exaggerating? Why? Nationality, Political 
View Are there glaring omissions? position, 
Ethnicity/race, 
Gender 
Additional tips: You must analyze the source of THREE docs, but you should try for 4-5. Avoid absolute 
terms, instead speculate about the source saying “may have” or “could have”. Some documents work better 
with different parts of HIPP, you use them just like tools in a toolbox. If you need the same one every time, 
that's fine. If you need to use more than one tool to get the job done, that's fine too. 
NAME: DATE: 
CHART: CHANGE OVER TIME 
COMPARISON GROUPS: 
TIME PERIODS: 
THESIS 
First Second Key Key 
Category Category Changes Continuities 
BEGINNING 
TIME PERIOD 
INTERIM 
TIME PERIOD 
END 
TIME PERIOD 
CONCLUSION 

NAME: DATE: 
CHART: COMPARE & CONTRAST TWO CIVILIZATIONS 
COMPARISON TOPICS: 
COMPARISON GROUPS (3): 
(Use PERSIAN: Politics, Economics, Religion, Social, Intellectual, Artistic, Near) 
THESIS 
157 P Key Key 
Comparison Comparison Similarities Differences 
Topic Topic 
CONCLUSION 

Developing Historical Thinking Skills 
Cause and Effect 
Historical Thinking Skills: Chronological Reasoning (Causation, Change and Continuity 
over Time, Periodization), Argumentation 
Principles of Cause and Effect Relationships 
“Every event, pattern or trend, or action has a cause—a reason or set of reasons why it happened. 
Historians do not simply arrange events in chronological order; instead, they seek to understand why 
things happened, as well as what effect an event, pattern or trend, or action had. Most events, 
actions, or trends have many causes; historians seek to identify the most significant short-and long- 
term causes and effects.”—/Instructional Approaches, p. 119. 
Underlying Questions: 
. What were the reasons for this event? What factors contributed to a specific pattern 
or trend? 
- What resulted from this event, pattern, or action? What were the short-term effects? 
What were the long-term effects? 
. What cause seemed to be the most significant? What effect seemed to be the most 
significant and why? 
Long-Term Causes Short-Term Causes EVENT Short-Term Effects Long-Term Effects 
Short-term causes occur immediately prior to the event and directly lead to the event. Short-term 
effects are also immediate, but are perhaps brief consequences of the event, while long-term effects 
extend farther into the future and create more enduring impacts. Examine the items listed below and 
sort them into the appropriate columns for the causes and effects of the Meiji Restoration of 1868: 
Attack on Pearl Harbor Creation of central bureaucracy under the Tokugawa 
Japan became a world economic power Replacement of daimyo with district administrators 
appointed by the government 
Arrival of Commodore Perry in Edo Bay  Industrial Revolution in the Atlantic world 
Note: Some of the events listed may not be related to the Meiji Restoration. Also, be prepared to 
argue about the relative importance or relevance of events to this cause and effect sequence. Some 
events may also present enduring continuities in Japanese society that both precede or follow the 
Meiji Restoration. Structure the events in the accompanying chart:
Causation and Context in the Russian Revolution 
Historical Thinking Skills: Chronological Reasoning . ; 
(Causation, Comparison, Contextualization, Periodization and ¥ o — 
Synthesis) ; oog 
Time Line for the Russian Revolution 
January, 1905 Bloody Sunday: Russian workers peacefully B2 
demonstrating on the streets of Saint Petersburg massacred by tsar’s [§ 
cavalry. Leads to the establishment of a representative assembly 
(Duma) in 1906 that is stifled by Tsar Nicholas IL 
1914-1915 World War I: Russia suffers bitter military defeats as 
hunger and wandering refugees destabilize Nicholas II's 
government. Mass anti-conscription riots break out. In November, 
elected labor representatives on the Petrograd War Industries 
Committee (one of the few legal workers’ organizations) proclaims 
that the government had taken Russia into a war for capital markets and calls for a democratic peace 
without annexations or indemnities. 
October-November 1916: Over 20 mutinies occur, some involving whole regiments; there is a 
collective refusal of orders to attack or prepare to attack. Dozens of subsistence riots flare across 
European Russia blaming the Tsar for food shortages and rising prices. 
December 1916-January 1917: Russia faces a more acute subsistence crisis than any other country. 
Russia stood on the verge of revolution triggered by the demands placed on its population by 
participation in the Great War. 
March 1917-November 1917 Provisional Government: Nicholas Il abdicates Russian throne and 
the Provisional Government led by Alexander Kerensky is installed to conduct free elections and 
institute liberal democracy. 
April 1917 April Theses: Lenin arrives in Saint Petersburg, reasserts leadership of the Bolshevik 
party and issues revolutionary demands. 
July, 1917 Abortive Coup: Premature attempt to overthrow Provisional Government fails. Trotsky 
is arrested and Lenin flees Russia. 
November-December, 1917 Bolshevik Revolution: Lenin tries another coup and this one is 
successful. Provisional Government is overthrown and Kerensky leaves Russia. Bolsheviks 
suppress newspapers, create secret police, and dismiss assembly to protect their revolution.
March, 1918 Treaty of Brest-Litovsk: Bolsheviks conclude treaty with Germany that takes Russia 
out of the war and sacrifices Russian territory (Poland, the Baltic States, and the Ukraine) to the 
Germans. 
1918-1921 Russian Civil War: Fought between Red Russian Army 
(Communists) led by Trotsky and White Russians, supporters of 
the monarchy who were aided by Western troops. War 
Communism and domestic repression (Red Terror) instituted by 
Lenin to crush domestic dissent. 
The Historical Concept of Contextualization: 
“Historians examine the historical context of events to understand 
why things happened the way they did. Context is different from 
causation in that instead of focusing on specific events or actions 
that may have caused another event to occur, historians refer to 
context as the larger constellation of developments and processes 
that may not have served as a specific cause, but may still have 
influenced an event. In other words, the context of an event often 
influences its course, even if it did not cause the 
event."—Instructional Approaches to Context, p. 118. 
Underlying Context Questions: 
What was happening at the time the event happened or the document was created that 
might have had an influence? 
What was happening at the specific place where an event occurred? In the country 
as a whole? In the larger region? In the world? 
How does a specific event relate to larger processes? How do larger processes shape 
a specific event? 
Discussion Questions: 
1. What were the causes of the Russian Revolution in 1917? Why is this an inadequate 
question? How does periodization influence this question? How do you solve this 
problem? 
What was the context that influenced the Bolshevik Revolution? How did the 
context influence the causes? How do you separate the two? Why did the Russian 
Revolution succeed? How would perspective and point of view come into play here?
Thematic Analysis and Synthesis: 
3. Revolution and Historical Transition: Against great odds, why were the Bolsheviks 
able to overthrow the Provisional Government and come to power in Russiain 19177 
How would you compare the Russian Revolution to the French Revolution or the 
Nazi revolution in Germany? Did each exist within a different historical context? 
What factors unite them as political revolutions? 
The Hero in History: How essential is leadership in a successful revolution? What 
is the role of a leader? What abilities or mind-set linked Robespierre, Lenin, and 
Hitler? What is the role of the individual in asserting change in history? 
The Big Picture: Karl Marx argued that the individual had minimal influence on the 
social and economic forces that propelled historical events. How then does one 
explain the crucial role of Lenin in the Russian Revolution? Marx also predicted that 
the state under communism would eventually “wither away” rather than grow more 
pervasive, as happened under Stalin. What happened? 
And What about Lenin? Do You Buy it? 
The essence of Bolshevism, the essence of Soviet power, lies in exposing the fraud and hypocrisy 
of bourgeois democracy, in abolishing the private ownership of the land, the factories, and in 
concentrating all political power in the hands of the toilers and the exploited masses. 
—V. L. Lenin 
Evenifforevery hundred correct things we did, we committed ten thousand mistakes, our revolution 
would still be—and it will be in the judgment of history—great and invincible; for this is the first 
time that the working people are themselves building a new life. 
—V. L. Lenin 
